West Virginia, session 2025, HB2026.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: TITLE I – GENERAL PROVISIONS.  Section 1. General policy. – The purpose of this bill is to appropriate money necessary for the economical and efficient discharge of the duties and responsibilities of the state and its agencies during the fiscal year 2026. Sec. 2. Definitions. — For the purpose of this bill:		“Governor” shall mean the Governor of the State of West Virginia.		“Code” shall mean the Code of West Virginia, one thousand nine hundred thirty-one, as amended.		“Spending unit” shall mean the department, bureau, division, office, board, commission, agency, or institution to which an appropriation is made.		The “fiscal year 2026” shall mean the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.		“General revenue fund” shall mean the general operating fund of the state and includes all moneys received or collected by the state except as provided in W.V. Code §12-2-2 or as otherwise provided.		“Special revenue funds” shall mean specific revenue sources which by legislative enactments are not required to be accounted for as general revenue, including federal funds.		“From collections” shall mean that part of the total appropriation which must be collected by the spending unit to be available for expenditure. If the authorized amount of collections is not collected, the total appropriation for the spending unit shall be reduced automatically by the amount of the deficiency in the collections. If the amount collected exceeds the amount designated “from collections,” the excess shall be set aside in a special surplus fund and may be expended for the purpose of the spending unit as provided by Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code.  Sec. 3. Classification of appropriations. — An appropriation for:		“Personal services” shall mean salaries, wages and other compensation paid to full-time, part-time and temporary employees of the spending unit but shall not include fees or contractual payments paid to consultants or to independent contractors engaged by the spending unit. “Personal services” shall include “annual increment” for “eligible employees” and shall be disbursed only in accordance with Article 5, Chapter 5 of the Code.		Unless otherwise specified, appropriations for “personal services” shall include salaries of heads of spending units.		“Employee benefits” shall mean social security matching, workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation, pension and retirement contributions, public employees insurance matching, personnel fees or any other benefit normally paid by the employer as a direct cost of employment. Should the appropriation be insufficient to cover such costs, the remainder of such cost shall be paid by each spending unit from its “unclassified” appropriation, or its “current expenses” appropriation or other appropriate appropriation. Each spending unit is hereby authorized and required to make such payments in accordance with the provisions of Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code.		Each spending unit shall be responsible for all contributions, payments or other costs related to coverage and claims of its employees for unemployment compensation and workers compensation. Such expenditures shall be considered an employee benefit.		“BRIM Premiums” shall mean the amount charged as consideration for insurance protection and includes the present value of projected losses and administrative expenses. Premiums are assessed for coverages, as defined in the applicable policies, for claims arising from, inter alia, general liability, wrongful acts, property, professional liability, and automobile exposures.		Should the appropriation for “BRIM Premium” be insufficient to cover such cost, the remainder of such costs shall be paid by each spending unit from its “unclassified” appropriation, its “current expenses” appropriation or any other appropriate appropriation to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management. Each spending unit is hereby authorized and required to make such payments. If there is no appropriation for “BRIM Premium” such costs shall be paid by each spending unit from its “current expenses” appropriation, “unclassified” appropriation or other appropriate appropriation.		West Virginia Council for Community and Technical College Education and Higher Education Policy Commission entities operating with special revenue funds and/or federal funds shall pay their proportionate share of the Board of Risk and Insurance Management total insurance premium cost for their respective institutions.		“Current expenses” shall mean operating costs other than personal services and shall not include equipment, repairs and alterations, buildings, or lands. Each spending unit shall be responsible for and charged monthly for all postage meter service and shall reimburse the appropriate revolving fund monthly for all such amounts. Such expenditures shall be considered a current expense.		“Equipment” shall mean equipment items which have an appreciable and calculable period of usefulness in excess of one year.		“Repairs and alterations” shall mean routine maintenance and repairs to structures and minor improvements to property which do not increase the capital assets.		“Buildings” shall include new construction and major alteration of existing structures and the improvement of lands and shall include shelter, support, storage, protection, or the improvement of a natural condition.		“Lands” shall mean the purchase of real property or interest in real property.		“Capital outlay” shall mean and include buildings, lands or buildings and lands, with such category or item of appropriation to remain in effect as provided by W.V. Code §12-3-12.		From appropriations made to the spending units of state government, upon approval of the Governor there may be transferred to a special account an amount sufficient to match federal funds under any federal act.		Appropriations classified in any of the above categories shall be expended only for the purposes as defined above and only for the spending units herein designated: Provided, That the secretary of each department shall have the authority to transfer within the department those general revenue funds appropriated to the various agencies of the department: Provided, however, That no more than five percent of the general revenue funds appropriated to any one agency or board may be transferred to other agencies or boards within the department: and no funds may be transferred to a “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” appropriation unless the source funds are also wholly from a “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” line, or unless the source funds are from another appropriation that has exclusively funded employment expenses for at least twelve consecutive months prior to the time of transfer and the position(s) supported by the transferred funds are also permanently transferred to the receiving agency or board within the department: Provided further, Notwithstanding any previous provision no more than twenty-five percent of the general revenue funds appropriated to the following funds 0401, 0402, 0408, 0409, 0410, 0411, 0412, 0413, 0414 and 0415 within the Department of Health Facilities may be transferred between the aforementioned funds: Provided further, Notwithstanding any previous provision no general revenue funds appropriated to the following funds 0403, 0481, 0482, 0483, 0484, 0485, 0486, 0487, 0488, 0489, 0492, 0493, 0494, 0495 and 0496 within the Department of Human Services may be transferred between the aforementioned funds: and no funds may be transferred to a “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” appropriation unless the source funds are also wholly from a “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” line, or unless the source funds are from another appropriation that has exclusively funded employment expenses for at least twelve consecutive months prior to the time of transfer and the position(s) supported by the transferred funds are also permanently transferred to the receiving agency or board within the department: Provided further, That the secretary of each department and the director, commissioner, executive secretary, superintendent, chairman or any other agency head not governed by a departmental secretary as established by Chapter 5F of the Code shall have the authority to transfer funds appropriated to “Personal Services and Employee Benefits,” “Current Expenses,” “Repairs and Alterations,” “Equipment,” “Other Assets,” “Land,” “Buildings,” “Contract Nursing”, and “Unclassified” to other appropriations within the same account and no funds from other appropriations shall be transferred to the “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” or the “Unclassified” appropriation except that during Fiscal Year 2026, and upon approval from the State Budget Office, agencies with the appropriation “Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and Agency Heads” and “Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials” may transfer between this appropriation and the appropriation “Personal Services and Employee Benefits” an amount to cover annualized salaries and employee benefits for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, as provided by W.V. Code §6-7-2a: And provided further, That no authority exists hereunder to transfer funds into appropriations to which no funds are legislatively appropriated: And provided further, That if the Legislature creates new, consolidates, reorganizes or terminates agencies, boards or functions, within any fiscal year the secretary or other appropriate agency head, or in the case of the termination of a spending unit of the state, the Director of the State Budget Office, in the absence of general law providing otherwise, may transfer the funds formerly appropriated to such agency, board or function, allocating items of appropriation as may be necessary if only part of the item may be allocated, in order to implement such consolidation, reorganization or termination. No funds may be transferred from a Special Revenue Account, dedicated account, capital expenditure account or any other account or fund specifically exempted by the Legislature from transfer, except that the use of the appropriations from the State Road Fund for the office of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation is not a use other than the purpose for which such funds were dedicated and is permitted.		Appropriations otherwise classified shall be expended only where the distribution of expenditures for different purposes cannot well be determined in advance or it is necessary or desirable to permit the spending unit the freedom to spend an appropriation for more than one of the above classifications.  Sec. 4. Method of expenditure. — Money appropriated by this bill, unless otherwise specifically directed, shall be appropriated, and expended according to the provisions of Article 3, Chapter 12 of the Code or according to any law detailing a procedure specifically limiting that article.  Sec. 5. Maximum expenditures. — No authority or requirement of law shall be interpreted as requiring or permitting an expenditure in excess of the appropriations set out in this bill. TITLE II – APPROPRIATIONS.ORDER OF SECTIONS SECTION 1.	Appropriations from general revenue.SECTION 2.	Appropriations from state road fund.SECTION 3.	Appropriations from other funds.SECTION 4.	Appropriations from lottery net profits.SECTION 5.	Appropriations from state excess lottery revenue.SECTION 6.	Appropriations of federal funds.SECTION 7.	Appropriations from federal block grants.SECTION 8.	Awards for claims against the state.SECTION 9.	Appropriations from general revenue fund surplus accrued.SECTION 10.		Appropriations from lottery net profits surplus accrued.SECTION 11.	Appropriations from state excess lottery revenue surplus accrued.SECTION 12.	Special revenue appropriations.SECTION 13.	State improvement fund appropriations.SECTION 14.	Specific funds and collection accounts.SECTION 15.	Appropriations for refunding erroneous payment.SECTION 16.	Sinking fund deficiencies.SECTION 17.	Appropriations for local governments.SECTION 18.	Total appropriations.SECTION 19.	General school fund. 		Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. – From the State Fund, General Revenue, there are hereby appropriated conditionally upon the fulfillment of the provisions set forth in Article 2, Chapter 11B the following amounts, as itemized, for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. LEGISLATIVE Senate Fund 0165 FY 2026 Org 2100							General					Appro-		Revenue					priation		Fund Compensation of Members (R)			00300	$	1,010,000            Compensation and Per Diem of Officers	and Employees (R)			00500		4,111,332Current Expenses and Contingent Fund (R)			02100		821,392Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		35,000Technology Repair and Modernization (R)			29800		80,000Expenses of Members (R)			39900		550,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		44,482	Total					$	6,652,206		The appropriations for the Senate for the fiscal year 2025 are to remain in full force and effect and are hereby reappropriated to June 30, 2026.  Any balances so reappropriated may be transferred and credited to the fiscal year 2025 accounts.	Upon the written request of the Clerk of the Senate, the Auditor shall transfer amounts between items of the total appropriation in order to protect or increase the efficiency of the service.		The Clerk of the Senate, with the approval of the President, is authorized to draw his or her requisitions upon the Auditor, payable out of the Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the Senate, for any bills for supplies and services that may have been incurred by the Senate and not included in the appropriation bill, for supplies and services incurred in preparation for the opening, the conduct of the business and after adjournment of any regular or extraordinary session, and for the necessary operation of the Senate offices, the requisitions for which are to be accompanied by bills to be filed with the Auditor.		The Clerk of the Senate, with the approval of the President, or the President of the Senate shall have authority to employ such staff personnel during any session of the Legislature as shall be needed in addition to staff personnel authorized by the Senate resolution adopted during any such session. The Clerk of the Senate, with the approval of the President, or the President of the Senate shall have authority to employ such staff personnel between sessions of the Legislature as shall be needed, the compensation of all staff personnel during and between sessions of the Legislature, notwithstanding any such Senate resolution, to be fixed by the President of the Senate. The Clerk is hereby authorized to draw his or her requisitions upon the Auditor for the payment of all such staff personnel for such services, payable out of the appropriation for Compensation and Per Diem of Officers and Employees or Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the Senate.		For duties imposed by law and by the Senate, the Clerk of the Senate shall be paid a monthly salary as provided by the Senate resolution, unless increased between sessions under the authority of the President, payable out of the appropriation for Compensation and Per Diem of Officers and Employees or Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the Senate.		Included in the above appropriation for Senate (fund 0165, appropriation 02100), an amount not less than $5,000 is to be used for the West Virginia Academy of Family Physicians - Doc of the Day Program. House of Delegates Fund 0170 FY 2026 Org 2200 Compensation of Members (R)			00300	$	3,500,000Compensation and Per Diem of Officers	and Employees (R)			00500		575,000Current Expenses and Contingent Fund (R)			02100		6,500,000Expenses of Members (R)			39900		1,350,000Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment (R)			58900		500,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		60,000	Total					$	12,485,000		The appropriations for the House of Delegates for the fiscal year 2025 are to remain in full force and effect and are hereby reappropriated to June 30, 2026.  Any balances so reappropriated may be transferred and credited to the fiscal year 2025 accounts.		Upon the written request of the Clerk of the House of Delegates, the Auditor shall transfer amounts between items of the total appropriation in order to protect or increase the efficiency of the service.		The Clerk of the House of Delegates, with the approval of the Speaker, is authorized to draw his or her requisitions upon the Auditor, payable out of the Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the House of Delegates, for any bills for supplies and services that may have been incurred by the House of Delegates and not included in the appropriation bill, for bills for services and supplies incurred in preparation for the opening of the session and after adjournment, and for the necessary operation of the House of Delegates’ offices, the requisitions for which are to be accompanied by bills to be filed with the Auditor.		The Speaker of the House of Delegates shall have authority to employ such staff personnel during and between sessions of the Legislature as shall be needed, in addition to personnel designated in the House resolution, and the compensation of all personnel shall be as fixed in such House resolution for the session or fixed by the Speaker during and between sessions of the Legislature, notwithstanding such House resolution. The Clerk of the House of Delegates is hereby authorized to draw requisitions upon the Auditor for such services, payable out of the appropriation for the Compensation and Per Diem of Officers and Employees or Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the House of Delegates.		For duties imposed by law and by the House of Delegates, including salary allowed by law as keeper of the rolls, the Clerk of the House of Delegates shall be paid a monthly salary as provided in the House resolution, unless increased between sessions under the authority of the Speaker and payable out of the appropriation for Compensation and Per Diem of Officers and Employees or Current Expenses and Contingent Fund of the House of Delegates.		Included in the above appropriation for House of Delegates (fund 0170, appropriation 02100), an amount not less than $5,000 is to be used for the West Virginia Academy of Family Physicians - Doc of the Day Program. Joint Expenses (W.V. Code Chapter 4)Fund 0175 FY 2026 Org 2300 Joint Committee on Government and Finance (R)			10400	$	9,725,138Legislative Printing (R)			10500		260,000Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee (R)			10600		147,250Legislative Computer System (R)			10700		1,447,500Legislative Dues and Fees (R)			10701		600,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		60,569	Total					$	12,240,457		The appropriations for the Joint Expenses for the fiscal year 2025 are to remain in full force and effect and are hereby reappropriated to June 30, 2026. Any balances reappropriated may be transferred and credited to the fiscal year 2025 accounts.		Upon the written request of the Clerk of the Senate, with the approval of the President of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Delegates, with the approval of the Speaker of the House of Delegates, and a copy to the Legislative Auditor, the Auditor shall transfer amounts between items of the total appropriation in order to protect or increase the efficiency of the service.JUDICIAL Supreme Court – General JudicialFund 0180 FY 2026 Org 2400Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	140,730,477Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		45,000Equipment (R)			07000		1,600,000Military Services Members Court (R)			09002		0Judges’ Retirement System (R)			11000		1,247,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		23,326,564Buildings (R)			25800		165,000Other Assets (R)			69000		80,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		1,032,409	Total					$	168,226,450		The appropriations to the Supreme Court of Appeals for the fiscal years 2022, 2023, 2024, and 2025 are to remain in full force and effect and are hereby reappropriated to June 30, 2026. Any balances so reappropriated may be transferred and credited to the fiscal year 2025 accounts.		This fund shall be administered by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Appeals, who shall draw requisitions for warrants in payment in the form of payrolls, making deductions therefrom as required by law for taxes and other items.		From the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0180, appropriation 13000) $1,000,000 shall be used for facility maintenance for magistrate courts.		The appropriation for the Judges’ Retirement System (fund 0180, appropriation 11000) is to be transferred to the Consolidated Public Retirement Board, in accordance with the law relating thereto, upon requisition of the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Appeals.EXECUTIVE Governor’s Office (W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 0101 FY 2026 Org 0100 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,357,899Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200		266,594Repairs and Alterations			06400		25,000Equipment			07000		1,000National Governors Association			12300		60,700Current Expenses (R)			13000		799,000Community Food Program			18500		1,000,000Office of Resiliency (R)			18600		626,650BRIM Premium			91300		183,645	Total					$	6,320,488		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0101, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0101, appropriation 13000), Office of Resiliency (fund 0101, appropriation 18600), Posey Perry Emergency Food Bank Fund (fund 0101, appropriation 42303), and Posey Perry Emergency Food Bank Fund – Surplus (fund 0101, appropriation 42399) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Governor’s Office – Custodial Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 0102 FY 2026 Org 0100Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	431,755Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		1,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		182,158	Total					$	619,913		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0102, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		Appropriations are to be used for current general expenses, including compensation of employees, household maintenance, cost of official functions, and additional household expenses occasioned by such official functions. Governor’s Office – Civil Contingent Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 0105 FY 2026 Org 0100Civil Contingent Fund (R)				61400	$	5,000,000Local Economic Development Assistance (R)				81900		5,000,000	Total					$	10,000,000		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations Civil Contingent Fund – Total (fund 0105, appropriation 11400), 2012 Natural Disasters – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 13500), Congressional Earmark Maintenance of Effort – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 22599), Civil Contingent Fund – Total – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 23800), Civil Contingent Fund – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 26300), Local Economic Development Assistance – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 26600), Civil Contingent Fund – Rural Hospitals – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 40199), Civil Contingent Fund (fund 0105, appropriation 61400), Milton Flood Wall (fund 0105, appropriation 75701), Milton Flood Wall – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 75799), Natural Disasters – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 76400),  Local Economic Development Assistance (fund 0105, appropriation 81900), and Federal Funds/Grant Match – Surplus (fund 0105, appropriation 85700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From this fund there may be expended, at the discretion of the Governor, an amount not to exceed $1,000 as West Virginia’s contribution to the Interstate Oil Compact Commission.		The above fund is intended to provide contingency funding for accidental, unanticipated, emergency, or unplanned events which may occur during the fiscal year and is not to be expended for the normal day-to-day operations of the Governor’s Office. Auditor’s Office – General Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 0116 FY 2026 Org 1200Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,566,274Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200		192,704Current Expenses (R)			13000		13,429BRIM Premium			91300		12,077	Total					$	2,784,484		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0116, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Treasurer’s Office (W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 0126 FY 2026 Org 1300 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,706,621Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200		192,704Unclassified			09900		31,463Abandoned Property Program			11800		41,794Current Expenses (R)			13000		572,684Other Assets			69000		10,000ABLE Program			69201		150,000BRIM Premium			91300		59,169	Total					$	3,764,435		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0126, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Department of Agriculture (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 0131 FY 2026 Org 1400Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	7,246,666Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200		192,704Animal Identification Program			03900		141,212State Farm Museum			05500		87,759Gypsy Moth Program (R)			11900		1,175,979WV Farmers Market			12801		150,467Current Expenses (R)			13000		588,115Black Fly Control			13700		463,870HEMP Program			13701		400,007Donated Foods Program			36300		45,000Veterans to Agriculture Program (R)			36301		278,420SNAP Stretch Program			xxxxx		360,000Predator Control (R)			47000		176,400Bee Research			69100		78,450Microbiology Program			78500		110,995Moorefield Agriculture Center			78600		1,121,739Chesapeake Bay Watershed			83000		129,485Livestock Care Standards Board			84300		8,820Agriculture Programs			XXXXX		0WVDA FFA Secretary			XXXXX		100,000BRIM Premium			91300		138,905State FFA-FHA Camp and Conference Center			94101		820,592Threat Preparedness			94200		81,513WV Food Banks			96900		426,000Senior’s Farmers’ Market Nutrition Coupon Program			97000		56,328	Total					$	14,379,426		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Gypsy Moth Program (fund 0131, appropriation 11900), Current Expenses (fund 0131, appropriation 13000), Veterans to Agriculture Program (fund 0131, appropriation 36301), 2024 Drought Relief – Surplus (fund 0131, appropriation 40499), Predator Control (fund 0131, appropriation 47000), and Agricultural Disaster and Mitigation Needs – Surplus (fund 0131, appropriation 85000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		A portion of the Current Expenses appropriation may be transferred to a special revenue fund for the purpose of matching federal funds for marketing and development activities.		The above appropriation for Predator Control (fund 0131, appropriation 47000) is to be made available to the United States Department of Agriculture, Wildlife Services to administer the Predator Control Program.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0131, appropriation 13000) $100,000 shall be used for the Willowbend Agricultural Innovation Center.		From the above appropriation for WV Food Banks (fund 0131, appropriation 96900), $20,000 is for House of Hope and the remainder of the appropriation shall be allocated to the Huntington Food Bank and the Mountaineer Food Bank in Braxton County. West Virginia Conservation Agency (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 0132 FY 2026 Org 1400Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	927,240Unclassified			09900		77,059Soil Conservation Projects (R)			12000		10,937,786Current Expenses (R)			13000		317,848BRIM Premium			91300		34,428	Total					$	12,294,361		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Soil Conservation Projects (fund 0132, appropriation 12000), Current Expenses (fund 0132, appropriation 13000), and Soil Conservation Projects – Surplus (fund 0132, appropriation 26900) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Department of Agriculture – Meat Inspection Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 0135 FY 2026 Org 1400Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,097,727Unclassified			09900		7,090Current Expenses			13000		82,605	Total					$	1,187,422		Any part or all of this appropriation may be transferred to a special revenue fund for the purpose of matching federal funds for the above-named program. Department of Agriculture – Agricultural Awards Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 0136 FY 2026 Org 1400 Programs and Awards for 4-H Clubs and FFA/FHA			57700	$	15,000 Department of Agriculture – West Virginia Agricultural Land Protection Authority(W.V. Code Chapter 8A)Fund 0607 FY 2026 Org 1400Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	109,515Unclassified			09900		950	Total					$	110,465 Attorney General (W.V. Code Chapters 5, 14, 46A and 47)Fund 0150 FY 2026 Org 1500Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	3,647,491Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200		192,704Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		7,500Unclassified (R)			09900		24,428Current Expenses (R)			13000		681,295Criminal Convictions and Habeas Corpus Appeals (R)			26000		1,018,132Better Government Bureau			74000		293,418BRIM Premium			91300		120,654	Total					$	5,986,622 Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0150, appropriation 00100), Unclassified (fund 0150, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0150, appropriation 13000), and Criminal Convictions and Habeas Corpus Appeals (fund 0150, appropriation 26000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		When legal counsel or secretarial help is appointed by the Attorney General for any state spending unit, this account shall be reimbursed from such spending units specifically appropriated account or from accounts appropriated by general language contained within this bill:  Provided, That the spending unit shall reimburse at a rate and upon terms agreed to by the state spending unit and the Attorney General:  Provided, however, That if the spending unit and the Attorney General are unable to agree on the amount and terms of the reimbursement, the spending unit and the Attorney General shall submit their proposed reimbursement rates and terms to the Governor for final determination. Secretary of State (W.V. Code Chapters 3, 5, and 59)Fund 0155 FY 2026 Org 1600 Salary and Benefits of Elected Officials			00200	$	192,704Unclassified (R)			09900		8,352Current Expenses (R)			13000		781,584BRIM Premium			91300		34,500	Total					$	1,017,140		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0155, appropriation 09900) and Current Expenses (fund 0155, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Election Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 3)Fund 0160 FY 2026 Org 1601 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,477Unclassified			09900		75Current Expenses			13000		4,956	Total					$	7,508 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION Department of Administration – Office of the Secretary(W.V. Code Chapter 5F)Fund 0186 FY 2026 Org 0201Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	498,187Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		153,400Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Equipment			07000		1,000Unclassified			09900		9,177Current Expenses			13000		86,009Financial Advisor (R)			30400		27,546Lease Rental Payments			51600		15,431,900Design-Build Board			54000		4,000Other Assets			69000		100BRIM Premium			91300		5,736	Total					$	16,217,155		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Financial Advisor (fund 0186, appropriation 30400) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The appropriation for Lease Rental Payments (fund 0186, appropriation 51600) shall be disbursed as provided by W.V. Code §31-15-6b. Consolidated Public Retirement Board (W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 0195 FY 2026 Org 0205 		The Division of Highways, Division of Motor Vehicles, Public Service Commission, and other departments, bureaus, divisions, or commissions operating from special revenue funds and/or federal funds shall pay their proportionate share of the retirement costs for their respective divisions. When specific appropriations are not made, such payments may be made from the balances in the various special revenue funds in excess of specific appropriations. Division of Finance (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0203 FY 2026 Org 0209 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	68,694Unclassified			09900		1,400GAAP Project (R)			12500		671,260Current Expenses			13000		61,563BRIM Premium			91300		12,675	Total					$	815,592		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for GAAP Project (fund 0203, appropriation 12500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of General Services (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0230 FY 2026 Org 0211 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,190,973Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		5,000Unclassified			09900		20,000Fire Service Fee			12600		14,000Current Expenses			13000		1,148,349Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment (R)			58900		21,610,888BRIM Premium			91300		379,983	Total					$	26,369,693		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment (fund 0230, appropriation 58900), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0230, appropriation 67700), and Consolidated State Laboratory – Surplus (fund 0230, appropriation 37799) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Preservation and Maintenance of Statues and Monuments on Capitol Grounds (fund 0230, appropriation 37100), the Division shall consult the Division of Culture and History and Capitol Building Commission in all aspects of planning, assessment, maintenance, and restoration.		The above appropriation for Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment (fund 0230, appropriation 58900) shall be expended for capital improvements, maintenance, repairs, and equipment for state-owned buildings. Division of Purchasing (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0210 FY 2026 Org 0213 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	997,655Repairs and Alterations			06400		200Unclassified			09900		144Current Expenses			13000		1,285BRIM Premium			91300		6,922	Total					$	1,006,206		The Division of Highways shall reimburse Fund 2031 within the Division of Purchasing for all actual expenses incurred pursuant to the provisions of W.V. Code §17-2A-13. Travel Management (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0615 FY 2026 Org 0215 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	774,858Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		5,000Unclassified			09900		12,032Current Expenses			13000		440,247Buildings			25800		100Other Assets			69000		100	Total					$	1,233,337 Commission on Uniform State Laws (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0214 FY 2026 Org 0217 Current Expenses			13000	$	65,550		To pay expenses for members of the Commission on Uniform State Laws. West Virginia Public Employees Grievance Board (W.V. Code Chapter 6C)Fund 0220 FY 2026 Org 0219 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,050,241Equipment			07000		50Unclassified			09900		1,000Current Expenses			13000		136,035BRIM Premium			91300		8,000	Total					$	1,195,326 Ethics Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 6B)Fund 0223 FY 2026 Org 0220 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	563,393Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Unclassified			09900		2,200Current Expenses			13000		105,501Other Assets			69000		100BRIM Premium			91300		4,574	Total					$	676,268 Public Defender Services (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0226 FY 2026 Org 0221 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,987,292Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		119,000Unclassified			09900		313,300Current Expenses			13000		12,740Public Defender Corporations			35200		25,274,849Appointed Counsel Fees (R)			78800		17,691,113BRIM Premium			91300		10,575	Total					$	45,408,869		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Public Defender Corporations – Surplus (fund 0226, appropriation 35299), Appointed Counsel Fees - Surplus (fund 0226, appropriation 43500), and Appointed Counsel Fees (fund 0226, appropriation 78800) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Director shall have the authority to transfer funds from the appropriation to Public Defender Corporations (fund 0226, appropriation 35200) to Appointed Counsel Fees (fund 0226, appropriation 78800). Division of Personnel (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0206 FY 2026 Org 0222Directed Transfer			70000	$	900,000		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0206, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Division of Personnel (fund 2440). Committee for the Purchase of Commodities and Services from the Handicapped(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0233 FY 2026 Org 0224 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,187Current Expenses			13000		868	Total					$	4,055 West Virginia Prosecuting Attorneys Institute (W.V. Code Chapter 7)Fund 0557 FY 2026 Org 0228 Forensic Medical Examinations (R)			68300	$	572,276Federal Funds/Grant Match (R)			74900		118,204	Total					$	690,480		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Forensic Medical Examinations (fund 0557, appropriation 68300) and Federal Funds/Grant Match (fund 0557, appropriation 74900) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Office of Technology (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0204 FY 2026 Org 0231Directed Transfer			70000	$	7,200,000		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0204, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Office of Technology Fund (fund 2220). Real Estate Division (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 0610 FY 2026 Org 0233 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	724,702Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Equipment			07000		2,500Unclassified			09900		124Current Expenses			13000		138,881BRIM Premium			91300		8,284	Total					$	874,591 DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE Division of Forestry (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 0250 FY 2026 Org 0305 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	5,263,504Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		111,674Repairs and Alterations			06400		80,000Unclassified			09900		21,435Current Expenses			13000		558,024BRIM Premium			91300		98,754	Total					$	6,133,391		Out of the above appropriations a sum may be used to match federal funds for cooperative studies or other funds for similar purposes.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0250, appropriation 13099) and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0250, appropriation 34100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Geological and Economic Survey (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0253 FY 2026 Org 0306 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,898,787Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		112,753Repairs and Alterations			06400		968Unclassified			09900		27,678Current Expenses			13000		51,524Mineral Mapping System (R)			20700		1,232,093BRIM Premium			91300		24,486	Total					$	3,348,289		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Mineral Mapping System (fund 0253, appropriation 20700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above Unclassified and Current Expenses appropriations include funding to secure federal and other contracts and may be transferred to a special revolving fund (fund 3105) for the purpose of providing advance funding for such contracts. Division of Economic Development (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0256 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,856,055Unclassified			09900		108,055Current Expenses			13000		4,052,861Local Economic Development Partnerships (R)			13300		1,250,000ARC Assessment			13600		152,585Global Economic Development Partnerships (R)			20201		150,000Guaranteed Work Force Grant (R)			24200		997,499Mainstreet Program			79400		142,525Marshall University Research Corporation			80701		500,000BRIM Premium			91300		3,157Hatfield McCoy Recreational Trail			96000		198,415	Total					$	11,411,152		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified – Surplus (fund 0256, appropriation 09700), Partnership Grants (fund 0256, appropriation 13100), Local Economic Development Partnerships (fund 0256, appropriation 13300), Global Economic Development Partnerships (fund 0256, appropriation 20201), and Guaranteed Work Force Grant (fund 0256, appropriation 24200), and Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0256, appropriation 13099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0256, appropriation 13000), $50,000 shall be used for the Western Potomac Economic Partnership, $100,000 shall be used for Advantage Valley, $750,000 shall be used for the Robert C. Byrd Institute, $548,915 is for West Virginia University and $298,915 is for Southern West Virginia Community and Technical College for the Mine Training and Energy Technologies Academy. 		The above appropriation to Local Economic Development Partnerships (fund 0256, appropriation 13300) shall be used by the Division of Economic Development for the award of funding assistance to county and regional economic development corporations or authorities participating in the Certified Development Community Program developed under the provisions of W.V. Code §5B-2-14. The Division of Economic Development shall award the funding assistance through a matching grant program, based upon a formula whereby funding assistance may not exceed $50,000 per county served by an economic development or redevelopment corporation or authority. Office of Energy (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0612 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	600,000Current Expenses			13000		685,603	Total					$	1,285,603 Division of Labor (W.V. Code Chapters 21 and 47)Fund 0260 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,471,794Repairs and Alterations			06400		28,000Unclassified			09900		15,000Current Expenses			13000		212,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,500	Total					$	1,735,294 Division of Natural Resources (W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 0265 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	21,367,002Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		113,188Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Equipment			07000		100Unclassified			09900		184,711Current Expenses			13000		449,654Buildings (R)			25800		100Capital Outlay – Parks (R)			28800		3,434,945Litter Control Conservation Officers			56400		157,746Upper Mud River Flood Control (R)			65400		179,084Other Assets			69000		100Land (R)			73000		100Law Enforcement			80600		2,751,584BRIM Premium			91300		45,141	Total					$	28,683,555		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Equine Enrichment –Surplus (fund 0265, appropriation 22899), Buildings (fund 0265, appropriation 25800), Capital Outlay – Parks (fund 0265, appropriation 28800), Upper Mud River Flood Control (fund 0265, appropriation 65400), Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0265, appropriation 13099), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0265, appropriation 67700), Land (fund 0265, appropriation 73000), and State Park Improvements – Surplus (fund 0265, appropriation 76300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		Any revenue derived from mineral extraction at any state park shall be deposited in a special revenue account of the Division of Natural Resources, first for bond debt payment purposes and with any remainder to be for park operation and improvement purposes. Division of Miners’ Health, Safety and Training (W.V. Code Chapter 22A)Fund 0277 FY 2026 Org 0314 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	10,131,184Unclassified			09900		111,016Current Expenses			13000		1,396,141Coal Dust and Rock Dust Sampling			27000		517,987BRIM Premium			91300		80,668	Total					$	12,236,996		Included in the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0277, appropriation 13000) is $500,000 to be used for coal mine training activities at an established mine training facility in southern West Virginia. Board of Coal Mine Health and Safety (W.V. Code Chapter 22A)Fund 0280 FY 2026 Org 0319 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	235,177Unclassified			09900		3,480Current Expenses			13000		118,138	Total					$	356,795		Included in the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0280, appropriation 13000) up to $29,000 shall be used for the Coal Mine Safety and Technical Review Committee. WorkForce West Virginia (W.V. Code Chapter 21A)Fund 0572 FY 2026 Org 0323 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	51,433Unclassified			09900		584Current Expenses			13000		23,683	Total					$	75,700 Department of Commerce – Office of the Secretary(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0606 FY 2026 Org 0327 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,501,592Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		153,750Unclassified			09900		1,490Current Expenses			13000		353,147Directed Transfer			70000		0	Total					$	2,009,979 State Board of Rehabilitation – Division of Rehabilitation Services(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 0310 FY 2026 Org 0932 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	12,970,625Independent Living Services			00900		429,418Current Expenses			13000		558,815Workshop Development			16300		1,817,427Supported Employment Extended Services			20600		77,960Ron Yost Personal Assistance Fund			40700		333,828Employment Attendant Care Program			59800		131,575BRIM Premium			91300		77,464	Total					$	16,397,112		The above appropriation for Workshop Development (fund 0310, appropriation 16300) shall be used exclusively with the private nonprofit community rehabilitation program organizations known as work centers or sheltered workshops. The appropriation shall also be used to continue the support of the program, services, and individuals with disabilities currently in place at those organizations. DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM Department of Tourism – Office of the Secretary(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0246 FY 2026 Org 0304 Tourism – Brand Promotion (R)			61803	$	15,000,000Tourism – Public Relations (R)			61804		1,500,000Tourism – Events and Sponsorships (R)			61805		500,000Tourism – Industry Development (R)			61806		3,050,000State Parks and Recreation Advertising (R)			61900		1,500,000	Total					$	21,550,000		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Tourism – Development Opportunity Fund (fund 0246, appropriation 11601), Tourism – Brand Promotion (fund 0246, appropriation 61803), Tourism – Public Relations (fund 0246, appropriation 61804), Tourism – Events and Sponsorships (fund 0246, appropriation 61805), Tourism – Industry Development (fund 0246, appropriation 61806), State Parks and Recreation Advertising (fund 0246, appropriation 61900), Tourism – Brand Promotion – Surplus (fund 0246, appropriation 61893), and Tourism – Industry Development – Surplus (fund 0246, appropriation 61896) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation of Tourism – Industry Development (fund 0246, appropriation 61806) $250,000 shall be used for Appalachian Outlaw Trails, and $300,000 shall be used for Mountwood Park.		The Secretary of the Department of Tourism shall have the authority to transfer between the above items of appropriation. Division of Culture and History (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0293 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,345,222Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		0Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		1Unclassified (R)			09900		28,483Current Expenses			13000		3,175,898WV Humanities Council			16800		250,000Buildings			25800		1Other Assets			69000		1Educational Enhancements			69500		55,500Land				73000		1Culture and History Programming			73200		173,573Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		19,600Historical Highway Marker Program			84400		43,548BRIM Premium			91300		39,337	Total					$	8,132,165		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0293, appropriation 09900), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment (fund 0293, appropriation 58900), Capital Improvements – Surplus (fund 0293, appropriation 66100), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0293, appropriation 67700), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0293, appropriation 75500), and Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0293, appropriation 13099)  at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0293, appropriation 13000) $1,250,000 shall be used for roof repair for the Cultural Center, $500,000 shall be used for completion of the Cultural Center outdoor exhibit, and $750,000 shall be used to meet existing grant obligations. 		From the above appropriation for Educational Enhancements (fund 0293, appropriation 69500), $55,500 shall be used for the Clay Center.		The Current Expenses appropriation includes funding for the arts funds, department programming funds, grants, fairs and festivals, and Camp Washington Carver; and shall be expended only upon authorization of the Division of Culture and History and in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5A, Article 3, and Chapter 12 of the W.V. Code. Library Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 10)Fund 0296 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,023,402Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		112,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		6,500Current Expenses			13000		1,639,624Services to Blind & Handicapped			18100		161,717BRIM Premium			91300		18,205	Total					$	2,961,448		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0296, appropriation 13000) $1,500,000 shall be used for the Martinsburg Berkeley Public Library. Educational Broadcasting Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 10)Fund 0300 FY 2026 Org 0439Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,091,165Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		120,106Current Expenses			13000		113,844Mountain Stage			24900		450,000Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		49,250BRIM Premium			91300		47,727	Total					$	3,872,092		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0300, appropriation 75500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION State Board of Education – School Lunch Program(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0303 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	383,204Current Expenses			13000		2,118,865	Total					$	2,502,069 State Board of Education – State Department of Education(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0313 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,983,544Teachers’ Retirement Savings Realized			09500		39,831,000Unclassified (R)			09900		420,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		3,517,816Increased Enrollment			14000		13,653,041Safe Schools			14300		7,443,900Attendance Incentive Bonus (R)			15001		2,262,389National Teacher Certification (R)			16100		100,000Jobs & Hope – Childhood Drug Prevention Education			21901		2,000,000Technology Repair and Modernization			29800		951,003Hope Scholarship Program (R)			30401		24,610,523HVAC Technicians			35500		555,872Early Retirement Notification Incentive			36600		300,000MATH Program			36800		836,532Assessment Programs (R)			39600		3,750,759Governor’s Honors Academy (R)			47800		979,853English as a Second Language			52800		96,000Teacher Reimbursement			57300		297,188Hospitality Training			60000		281,051Youth in Government			61600		100,000High Acuity Special Needs (R)			63400		2,700,000Computer Science Education			xxxxx		2,000,000Foreign Student Education			63600		102,133State Board of Education Administrative Costs			68400		200,000Early Literacy Program			75600		5,724,015School Based Truancy Prevention (R)			78101		2,000,000Communities in Schools (R)			78103		4,912,637Mastery Based Education			78104		125,000Mountain State Digital Literacy Program			86401		1,300,00021st Century Learners (R)			88600		1,675,127BRIM Premium			91300		342,859Allowance for Extraordinary Sustained Growth			94300		71,980Education Programs			XXXXX		021st Century Assessment and Professional Development			93100		2,015,25421st Century Technology Infrastructure Network	Tools and Support (R)			93300		9,256,714Special Olympic Games			96600		25,000Educational Program Allowance			99600		716,250	Total					$	140,137,440		The above appropriations include funding for the State Board of Education and its executive office.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0313, appropriation 13000), $2,000,000 shall be used for the Department of Education Child Nutrition Program – Non-traditional Child Hunger Solutions.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0313, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0313, appropriation 13000), Center for Professional Development (fund 0313, appropriation 11500), Attendance Incentive Bonus (fund 0313, appropriation 15001), National Teacher Certification (fund 0313, appropriation 16100), Hope Scholarship Program (fund 0313, appropriation 30401), Assessment Programs (fund 0313, appropriation 39600), Benedum Professional Development Collaborative (fund 0313, appropriation 42700), Governor’s Honors Academy (fund 0313, appropriation 47800), High Acuity Special Needs (fund 0313, appropriation 63400), IT Academy (fund 0313, appropriation 72100),  School Based Truancy Prevention (fund 0313, appropriation 78101), Communities in Schools (fund 0313, appropriation 78103), 21st Century Learners (fund 0313, appropriation 88600), 21st Century Technology Infrastructure Network Tools and Support (fund 0313, appropriation 93300), and Communities in Schools – Surplus (fund 0313, appropriation 78199) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above appropriation for Teachers’ Retirement Savings Realized (fund 0313, appropriation 09500) shall be transferred to the Employee Pension and Health Care Benefit Fund (fund 2044).		From the above appropriation for Unclassified (fund 0313, appropriation 09900), $120,000 shall be for assisting low income students with AP and CLEP exam fees.		From the appropriation for Safe Schools (fund 0313, appropriation 14300), $3,100,000 shall be used for school mapping.		From the above appropriation for MATH Program (fund 0313, appropriation 36800), $50,000 shall be for Math Counts.		From the above appropriation for Educational Program Allowance (fund 0313, appropriation 99600), $100,000 shall be expended for the Morgan County Board of Education for Paw Paw Schools; $250,000 shall be for the Randolph County Board of Education for Pickens School; $100,000 shall be for the Randolph County Board of Education for the Harman School, $100,000 shall be for the Preston County Board of Education for the Aurora School; $100,000 shall be for the Fayette County Board of Education for Meadow Bridge; and $66,250 is for Project Based Learning in STEM fields. State Board of Education – Aid for Exceptional Children(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0314 FY 2026 Org 0402 Special Education – Counties			15900	$	7,425,757Special Education – Institutions			16000		4,397,051Education of Juveniles Held in Predispositional	Juvenile Detention Centers			30200		766,204Education of Institutionalized Juveniles and Adults (R)			47200		23,353,698	Total					$	35,942,710		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Education of Institutionalized Juveniles and Adults (fund 0314, appropriation 47200) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriations, the Superintendent shall have authority to expend funds for the costs of special education for those children residing in out-of-state placements. State Board of Education – State Aid to Schools(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0317 FY 2026 Org 0402 Other Current Expenses			02200	$	197,669,392Advanced Placement			05300		825,149Professional Educators			15100		956,210,509Service Personnel			15200		399,892,987Fixed Charges			15300		117,003,609Transportation			15400		100,315,326Improved Instructional Programs			15600		63,626,561Professional Student Support Services			65500		65,568,54321st Century Strategic Technology Learning Growth			93600		49,747,886Teacher and Leader Induction			93601		28,783,005Basic Foundation Allowances						1,979,642,967Less Local Share				               	(566,787,626)Adjustments						(3,422,328)Total Basic State Aid						1,409,433,013Public Employees’ Insurance Matching			01200		317,566,529Teachers’ Retirement System			01900		68,086,596Retirement Systems – Unfunded Liability			77500		223,829,404	Total					$	2,018,915,542 State Board of Education – Vocational Division(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0390 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,462,725Unclassified			09900		268,800Current Expenses			13000		883,106Wood Products – Forestry Vocational Program			14600		88,600Albert Yanni Vocational Program			14700		95,578Vocational Aid			14800		24,826,517Adult Basic Education			14900		5,905,442Jobs & Hope (R)			14902		3,502,531Program Modernization			30500		884,313High School Equivalency Diploma Testing (R)			72600		616,572FFA Grant Awards			83900		11,496Pre-Engineering Academy Program			84000		22,914Vocational Programs			XXXXX		0	Total					$	38,568,594		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Jim’s Dream (fund 0390, appropriation 14901), Jobs and Hope (fund 0390, appropriation 14902), High School Equivalency Diploma Testing (fund 0390, appropriation 72600), and Jobs & Hope – Surplus (fund 0390, appropriation 14099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Board of Education – West Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0320 FY 2026 Org 0403 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	11,225,286Repairs and Alterations			06400		164,675Equipment			07000		77,000Unclassified (R)			09900		110,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		2,150,696Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		670,000BRIM Premium			91300		130,842	Total					$	14,528,499		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0320, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0320, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0320, appropriation 25800), and Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0320, appropriation 75500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Board of Education – School Building Authority(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 0318 FY 2026 Org 0404 School Building Authority			45300	$	24,000,000		The above appropriation for School Building Authority (fund 0318, appropriation 45300) shall be transferred to the School Construction Fund (fund 3952).DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION Environmental Quality Board (W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 0270 FY 2026 Org 0311 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	101,968Repairs and Alterations			06400		800Equipment			07000		500Current Expenses			13000		28,453Other Assets			69000		400BRIM Premium			91300		791	Total					$	132,912 Division of Environmental Protection (W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 0273 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,488,900Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		168,000Water Resources Protection and Management			06800		604,369Current Expenses			13000		85,816Environmental Response and Cleanups			27101		91,922Dam Safety			60700		261,746West Virginia Stream Partners Program			63700		77,396West Virginia Drinking Water Treatment	Revolving Fund – Transfer			68900		647,500W.V. Contributions to River Commissions			77600		148,485Office of Water Resources Non-Enforcement Activity			85500		1,131,366	Total					$	7,705,500		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0273, appropriation 13099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Air Quality Board (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0550 FY 2026 Org 0325 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	61,581Repairs and Alterations			06400		800Equipment			07000		400Current Expenses			13000		11,612Other Assets			69000		200BRIM Premium			91300		2,304	Total					$	76,897 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH Department of Health – Central Office(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0407 FY 2026 Org 0506Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	429,073Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary	 and Agency Heads			00201		358,460Unclassified			09900		6,459Current Expenses			13000		5,239,831Pregnancy Centers			xxxxx		3,000,000Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		70,000BRIM Premium			91300		169,791	Total					$	9,273,614		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0407, appropriation 13000), $5,000,000 shall be used for the Ronald McDonald House of Morgantown.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0407, appropriation 75500), Emergency Response Entities – Special Projects (fund 0407, appropriation 82200), Tobacco Education Program (fund 0407, appropriation 90600), Tobacco Education Program – Surplus (fund 0407, appropriation xxxxx) and Pregnancy Centers – Surplus (fund 0407, appropriation 49999) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Department of Health – Office of the Shared Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0404 FY 2026 Org 0506Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,337,763Unclassified			09900		62,815Current Expenses			13000		1,214,699	Total					$	5,615,277 Bureau for Public Health – Office of the Commissioner(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0405 FY 2026 Org 0506Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,892,926Unclassified			09900		594,893Current Expenses			13000		66,099Maternal and Child Health Clinics, Clinicians and	Medical Contracts and Fees (R)			57500		300,000	Total					$	3,853,918		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Maternal and Child Health Clinics, Clinicians and Medical Contracts and Fees (fund 0405, appropriation 57500), at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Health Statistics Center(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0406 FY 2026 Org 0506Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	539,560Current Expenses			13000		76,026	Total					$	615,586 Bureau for Public Health – Office of Community Health and Health Promotion(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0438 FY 2026 Org 0506 Black Lung Clinics			46700	$	170,885Primary Care Support			62800		2,032,635Health Right Free Clinics			72700		5,250,000Healthy Lifestyles			77800		612,419Diabetes Education and Prevention			87300		97,125	Total					$	8,163,064		From the above appropriation for Primary Care Support (fund 0438, appropriation 62800), an amount not less than $100,000 shall be used for the West Virginia Cancer Coalition.		From the above appropriation for Health Right Free Clinics (fund 0438, appropriation 72700), $1,000,000 shall be used to support Health Right Free Clinics operating mobile medical primary care and mobile dental care clinics. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Environmental Health Services (W.V. Code Chapter 1Fund 0417 FY 2026 Org 0506Environmental Health Services (R)			30002	$	3,171,119		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation for Environmental Health Services (fund 0417, appropriation 30002) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Epidemiology and Prevention Services (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0418 FY 2026 Org 0506Cancer Registry			22500	$	231,607Vaccine for Children (R)			55100		341,261Tuberculosis Control			55300		305,048Epidemiology Support			62600		1,984,635	Total					$	2,862,551		From the above appropriation for Epidemiology Support (fund 0418, appropriation 62600), $50,000 shall be used for the West Virginia AIDS Coalition; and $100,000 shall be used for Adolescent Immunization Education.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation for Vaccine for Children (fund 0418, appropriation 55100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Laboratory Services (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0419 FY 2026 Org 0506Laboratory Services			30003	$	3,775,633 Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal, Child, and Family Health – Children’s Specialty Care(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0421 FY 2026 Org 0506Children’s Specialty Care (R)			30004	$	1,667,975		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation Children’s Specialty Care (fund 0421, appropriation 30004) at the close of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal, Child, and Family Health –Infant, Child, Adolescent, and Young Adult Health(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0422 FY 2026 Org 0506Sexual Assault Intervention and Prevention			72300	$	2,000,000Infant, Child Adolescent and 	Young Adult Health and Administration			30005		30,040	Total					$	2,030,040 Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal, Child, and Family Health –Maternal, Child, and Family Health Epidemiology(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0423 FY 2026 Org 0506Maternal Mortality Review			83400	$	53,031Maternal, Child and Family	 Health Epidemiology (R)			30006		411,683	Total					$	464,714		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation Maternal, Child and FamilyHealth Epidemiology (fund 0423, appropriation 30006) at the close of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal, Child and Family Health –Community Health(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0424 FY 2026 Org 0506Maternal and Child Health Community Health (R)			30007	$	429,832		From the above appropriation for Maternal and Child Health Community Health and Fees (fund 0424, appropriation 30007) $11,000 shall be used for the Marshall County Health Department for dental services.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation Maternal and Child Health Community Health (fund 0424, appropriation 30007) at the close of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal Child and Family Health –Women’s and Family Health(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0425 FY 2026 Org 0506Women’s and Family Health (R)			30008	$	2,556,146		From the above appropriation for Women’s and Family Health (fund 0425, appropriation 30008) up to $400,000 may be transferred to the Breast and Cervical Cancer Diagnostic Treatment Fund (fund 5197).		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation Women’s and Family Health (fund 0425, appropriation 30008) at the close of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Maternal Child and Family Health –West Virginia Birth to Three(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0426 FY 2026 Org 0506West Virginia Birth to Three (R)			30009	$	17,156,198		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation West Virginia Birth to Three (fund 0426, appropriation 30009) at the close of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Medical Cannabis (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0427 FY 2026 Org 0506Office of Medical Cannabis (R)			42001	$	1,137,238 	Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Office of Medical Cannabis (fund 0427, appropriation 42001) and Office of Medical Cannabis – Surplus (fund 0427, appropriation 42099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bureau for Public Health – Office of Nutrition Services (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0428 FY 2026 Org 0506Women, Infants, and Children			21000	$	38,621 Deaf and Hard of Hearing (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0429 FY 2026 Org 0506Commission for Deaf and Hard of Hearing			70400	$	241,270 Center for Local Health (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0431 FY 2026 Org 0506State Aid for Local and Basic Public Health Services			18400	$	19,038,864 Office of Chief Medical Examiner (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0432 FY 2026 Org 0506Chief Medical Examiner (R)			04500	$	14,071,667		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Chief Medical Examiner (fund 0432, appropriation 04500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Office of Emergency Medical Services (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0434 FY 2026 Org 0506Statewide EMS Program Support (R)			38300	$	1,681,427State Trauma and Emergency Care System			91800		1,975,140WVU Charleston Poison Control Hotline			94400		712,942Telestroke			30010		1,000,000	Total					$	5,369,509		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Statewide EMS Program Support (fund 0434, appropriation 38300) and Statewide EMS Program Support – Surplus (fund 0434, appropriation 38399) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Office of Threat Preparedness (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0435 FY 2026 Org 0506Threat Preparedness and Administration			30011	$	5,595 Human Rights Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 0416 FY 2026 Org 0510Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	1,118,596Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		114,091Unclassified (R)			09900		4,024Current Expenses (R)			13000		331,304BRIM Premium			91300		10,764	Total					$	1,578,779		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0416, appropriation 00100), Unclassified (fund 0416, appropriation 09900), and Current Expenses (fund 0416, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Office of the Inspector General (W.V. Code Chapter 16B)Fund 0437 FY 2026 Org 0513Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	6,811,769Repairs and Alterations			06400		1Equipment			07000		1Unclassified (R)			09900		57,469Current Expenses (R)			13000		812,466Other Assets			69000		1BRIM Premium			91300		121,134	Total					$	7,802,841		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0437, appropriation 13000), $73,065 shall be used for informal dispute resolution relating to nursing home administrative appeals.Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0437, appropriation 00100), Unclassified (fund 0437, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0437, appropriation 13000), and Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0437, appropriation 13099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.  DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES Division of Human Services (W.V. Code Chapters 9, 48, and 49)Fund 0403 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	32,219,482Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		162,850Unclassified			09900		5,632,055Current Expenses			13000		6,113,150Child Care Development			14400		3,167,767Jobs & Hope (R)			14902		2,357,000Social Services			19500		46,136Behavioral Health Program (R)			21900		64,469,814Family Resource Networks			27400		1,762,464Substance Abuse Continuum of Care (R)			35400		1,821,600Office of Drug Control Policy (R)			35401		592,652James “Tiger” Morton Catastrophic Illness Fund			45500		377,544In-Home Family Education			68800		1,100,000WV Works Separate State Program			69800		1,519,650Child Support Enforcement			70500		7,236,632Temporary Assistance for Needy Families/	Maintenance of Effort			70700		25,819,096Child Care – Maintenance of Effort Match			70800		5,693,743Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		11,875Medical Services Administrative Costs			78900		98,472Indigent Burials (R)			85100		1,550,000CHIP Administrative Costs			85601		706,386CHIP Services			85602		13,469,298BRIM Premium			91300		945,891Children’s Trust Fund – Transfer			95100		220,000	Total					$	177,093,557		From the above appropriation of Current Expenses (fund 0403, appropriation 13000), $300,000 shall be used for Green Acres Regional Center, Inc.		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Jobs & Hope (fund 0403, appropriation 14902), Behavioral Health Program (fund 0403, appropriation 21900), Behavioral Health Program – Surplus (fund 0403, appropriation 63100), Substance Abuse Continuum of Care (fund 0403, appropriation 35400), Office of Drug Control Policy (fund 0403, appropriation 35401), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0403, appropriation 75500), Indigent Burials (fund 0403, appropriation 85100), and Office of Drug Control Policy – Surplus (fund 0403, appropriation 35402) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		Notwithstanding the provisions of Title I, section three of this bill, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall have the authority to transfer funds within the above appropriations:  Provided, That no more than five percent of the funds appropriated to one appropriation may be transferred to other appropriations:  Provided, however, That no funds from other appropriations shall be transferred to the Personal Services and Employee Benefits appropriation. 		The Secretary shall have authority to expend funds for the educational costs of those children residing in out-of-state placements, excluding the costs of special education programs.		The above appropriation for James “Tiger” Morton Catastrophic Illness Fund (fund 0403, appropriation 45500) shall be transferred to the James “Tiger” Morton Catastrophic Illness Fund (fund 5454) as provided by Article 5Q, Chapter 16 of the WV Code.		The above appropriation for WV Works Separate State Program (fund 0403, appropriation 69800) shall be transferred to the WV Works Separate State College Program Fund (fund 5467) and the WV Works Separate State Two-Parent Program Fund (fund 5468) as determined by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.		From the above appropriation for Child Support Enforcement (fund 0403, appropriation 70500), an amount not to exceed $300,000 may be transferred to a local banking depository to be utilized to offset funds determined to be uncollectible.		Included in the appropriation for Behavioral Health Program (fund 0403, appropriation 21900), is $100,000 for Recovery Point of Huntington.  		The above appropriation for Children’s Trust Fund – Transfer (fund 0403, appropriation 95100) shall be transferred to the Children’s Trust Fund (fund 5469).		From the above appropriation for Substance Abuse Continuum of Care (fund 0403, appropriation 35400), the funding will be consistent with the goal areas outlined in the Comprehensive Substance Abuse Strategic Action Plan. Department of Human Services – Office of the Shared Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0481 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	10,709,072Unclassified			09900		252,842Current Expenses			13000		7,500,296PATH				95400		7,368,389	Total					$	25,830,599 Bureau for Medical Services – Office of the Commissioner(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0482 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	448,112Current Expenses			13000		446,183	Total					$	894,295 Bureau for Medical Services – Medical Services Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0483 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	9,658Current Expenses			13000		1,175Medical Services Administrative Costs			78900		47,116,150	Total					$	47,126,983 Bureau for Medical Services – Policy and Programming(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0484 FY 2026 Org 0511Medical Services			18900	$	79,174,335WV Teaching Hospitals Tertiary/Safety Net			54700		6,356,000Rural Hospitals Under 150 Beds			94000		2,596,000Case Management			30012		123,264Chiropractic Services			30013		5,784Clinic Services			30014		160,523Dental Services			30015		184,878Diagnostic, Screening, Preventive and Rehabilitative Services			30016		3,529Health Homes for Enrollees with Chronic Conditions			30017		141,477Hospice			30018		1,554,214Institution for Mental Disease Services			30019		1,418,872Intermediate Care Facility Services			30020		3,592,852Managed Care Organizations			30021		126,104,299Prescription Drugs			30022		21,934,109Physical and Occupational Therapy			30023		76,436Podiatry Services, Optometry Services and Prosthetics			30024		34,531Private Duty Nurses, Personal Care 	and Other Practitioner Services			30025		13,163,660Respiratory Care Services			30026		11,203Speech, Hearing, and Language Disorders			30027		14,237	Total					$	256,650,203		The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall have the authority to transfer between the above items of appropriation. Bureau for Medical Services – Home and Community Based Waiver Programs(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0485 FY 2026 Org 0511I/DD Waiver			46600	$	108,541,736Title XIX for Seniors Citizens			53300		47,060,282Traumatic Brain Injury Waiver			83500		1,000,000Substance Use Disorder Waiver			30028		926,366	Total					$	157,528,384 Bureau for Social Services – Office of the Commissioner(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0486 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	9,541,782Current Expenses			13000		2,272,246Social Services 			19500		7,793,934Domestic Violence Legal Services Fund			38400		400,000Child Protective Services Case Workers			46800		6,525,340Grants for Licensed Domestic Violence	Programs and Statewide Prevention			75000		2,500,000	Total					$	29,033,302		Included in the above appropriation for Social Services (fund 0486, appropriation 19500) is funding for continuing education requirements relating to the practice of social work.		The above appropriation for Domestic Violence Legal Services Fund (fund 0486, appropriation 38400) shall be transferred to the Domestic Violence Legal Services Fund (fund 5455).		From the above appropriation for the Grants for Licensed Domestic Violence Programs and Statewide Prevention (fund 0486, appropriation 75000), 50 percent of the total shall be divided equally and distributed among the 14 licensed programs and the West Virginia Coalition Against Domestic Violence (WVCADV). The balance remaining in the appropriation for Grants for Licensed Domestic Violence Programs and Statewide Prevention (fund 0486, appropriation 75000), shall be distributed according to the formula established by the Family Protection Services Board. Bureau for Social Services – Children’s Services (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0487 FY 2026 Org 0511 Social Services			19500	$	41,525,266Family Preservation Program			19600		1,565,000Current Expenses			13000		2,000	Total					$	43,092,266 Bureau for Social Services – Adoption (W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0488 FY 2026 Org 0511Social Services			19500	$	74,283,410 Bureau for Social Services – Foster Care(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0489 FY 2026 Org 0511Social Services			19500	$	174,966,649 Bureau for Social Services – Adult Services(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0492 FY 2026 Org 0511Social Services			19500	$	6,056,125 Bureau for Social Services – Child Protective Services Case Workers(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0493 FY 2026 Org 0511Social Services			19500	$	5,157,339Child Protective Services Case Workers			46800		24,964,445	Total					$	30,121,784 Bureau for Social Services – Social Service Case Workers(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0494 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100		2,637,980Current Expenses			13000		469,533Social Services			19500		7,529,649Child Protective Services Case Workers			46800		2,037,632	Total					$	12,674,794 Bureau for Social Services – Adult Protective Services Case Workers(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0495 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,916,510Current Expenses			13000		217,408	Total					$	5,133,918 Bureau for Social Services – Youth Service Case Workers(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0496 FY 2026 Org 0511Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100		1,153,162Current Expenses			13000		170,344Social Services			19500		4,522,073	Total					$	5,845,579DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FACILITIES Health Facilities – Central Office(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0401 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,719,019Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and			Agency Heads			00201		245,000Shared Administration			30029		1Current Expenses			13000		1,257,327BRIM Premium			91300		21,828Total					$		3,243,175 Health Facilities – Health Facilities Capital Projects Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0402 FY 2026 Org 0512Capital Outlay and Maintenance 			75500	$	550,000		The Secretary shall have the ability to transfer between appropriations for Capital Outlay and Maintenance within the funds 0402, 0408, 0409, 0410, 0411, 0412, 0413, 0414, and 0415 as needed. Health Facilities – Hopemont Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0408 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	6,524,211Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		90,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		2,173,082Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		3,893,811Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		40,000	Total					$	12,771,108		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0408, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0408, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0408, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0408, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0408, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0408, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0408, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0408, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0408, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – Lakin Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0409 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	8,366,804Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		60,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		2,363,676Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		3,539,262Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		174,055	Total					$	14,553,801		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0409, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0409, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0409, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0409, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0409, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0409, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0409, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0409, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0409, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – John Manchin Senior Health Care Center(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0410 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	4,168,092Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		50,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		1,471,878Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		2,907,556Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		72,136	Total					$	8,719,666		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0410, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0410, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0410, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0410, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0410, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0410, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0410, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0410, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0410, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – Jackie Withrow Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0411 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R) 			00100	$	7,201,092Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		200,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		2,655,893Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		2,000,311Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		167,074	Total					$	12,274,374		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0411, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0411, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0411, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0411, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0411, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0411, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0411, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0411, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0411, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – Welch Community Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0412 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	13,295,716       Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		1Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		15,525,686Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		250,000Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		149,300	Total					$	29,270,706		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0412, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0412, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0412, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0412, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0412, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0412, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0412, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0412, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0412, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – William R. Sharpe Jr. Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0413 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R) 			00100	$	28,384,787Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		350,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		10,280,300Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		41,969,835Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		315,334	Total					$	81,350,260		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0413, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0413, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0413, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0413, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0413, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0413, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0413, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0413, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0413, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – Mildred Mitchell-Bateman Hospital(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0414 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	25,979,665Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		300,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R)			13000		2,967,683Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		24,957,520Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		283,122	Total					$	54,537,994		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0414, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0414, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0414, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0414, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0414, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0414, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0414, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0414, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0414, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner. Health Facilities – William R. Sharpe Jr. Hospital – Transitional Living Facility(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 0415 FY 2026 Org 0512Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	1,610,133Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400		2,001Equipment (R)			07000		1Current Expenses (R) 			13000		171,794Buildings (R)			25800		1Other Assets (R)			69000		1Contract Nursing (R)			72301		10,000Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		50,000BRIM Premium (R)			91300		20,000	Total					$	1,863,931		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0415, appropriation 00100), Repairs and Alterations (fund 0415, appropriation 06400), Equipment (0415, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0415, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0415, appropriation 25800), Other Assets (fund 0415, appropriation 69000), Contract Nursing (fund 0415, appropriation 72301), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0415, appropriation 75500), and BRIM Premium (fund 0415, appropriation 91300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Secretary of the Department of Health Facilities shall have the authority to transfer between the items of appropriation in order to maintain staffing and other issues that arise in a timely manner.DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY Department of Homeland Security – Office of the Secretary(W.V. Code Chapter 5F)Fund 0430 FY 2026 Org 0601 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	701,752Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and 	Agency Heads			00201		168,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		500Unclassified (R)			09900		30,000Current Expenses			13000		91,636Fusion Center (R)			46900		3,084,238Other Assets			69000		500Directed Transfer			70000		32,000BRIM Premium			91300		22,563WV Fire and EMS Survivor Benefit (R)			93900		200,000	Total					$	4,331,689		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0430, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0430, appropriation 13099), Fusion Center (fund 0430, appropriation 46900), Justice Reinvestment Training – Surplus (fund 0430, appropriation 69900), WV Fire and EMS Survivor Benefit (fund 0430, appropriation 93900), and Homeland State Security Administrative Agency (fund 0430, appropriation 95300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0430, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Law-Enforcement, Safety and Emergency Worker Funeral Expense Payment Fund (fund 6003). Division of Emergency Management (W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 0443 FY 2026 Org 0606 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,329,771Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		61,250Repairs and Alterations			06400		600Unclassified			09900		21,022Current Expenses			13000		51,065Radiological Emergency Preparedness			55400		17,608SIRN….			55401		600,000Federal Funds/Grant Match (R)			74900		1,866,447Mine and Industrial Accident Rapid	Response Call Center			78100		538,524Early Warning Flood System (R)			87700		1,487,801BRIM Premium			91300		96,529	Total					$	7,070,617		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Federal Funds/Grant Match (fund 0443, appropriation 74900) and Early Warning Flood System (fund 0443, appropriation 87700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – West Virginia Parole Board(W.V. Code Chapter 62)Fund 0440 FY 2026 Org 0608 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	318,332Unclassified			09900		10,000Current Expenses			13000		234,440Salaries of Members of West Virginia Parole Board			22700		793,430BRIM Premium			91300		6,149	Total					$	1,362,351		The above appropriation for Salaries of Members of West Virginia Parole Board (fund 0440, appropriation 22700) includes funding for salary, annual increment (as provided for in W.V. Code §5-5-1), and related employee benefits of board members. Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Central Office(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0446 FY 2026 Org 0608 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	259,096Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		126,518Current Expenses			13000		2,400	Total					$	388,014 Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Correctional Units(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0450 FY 2026 Org 0608 Employee Benefits			01000	$	1,258,136Children’s Protection Act (R)			09000		838,437Unclassified			09900		1,578,800Current Expenses (R)			13000		57,690,483Facilities Planning and Administration (R)			38600		1,274,200Charleston Correctional Center 			45600		4,292,171Beckley Correctional Center			49000		3,373,622Anthony Correctional Center			50400		6,944,138Huttonsville Correctional Center			51400		23,315,435Northern Correctional Center			53400		10,321,311Inmate Medical Expenses (R)			53500		66,370,483Pruntytown Correctional Center			54300		11,167,934Corrections Academy			56900		2,342,458Information Technology Services			59901		2,759,052Martinsburg Correctional Center			66300		5,838,595Parole Services			68600		7,712,380Special Services			68700		7,470,058Directed Transfer			70000		20,759,291Investigative Services			71600		3,925,268Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		2,000,000Salem Correctional Center			77400		13,930,445McDowell County Correctional Center			79000		2,542,590Stevens Correctional Center			79100		14,348,351Parkersburg Correctional Center			82800		8,570,354St. Mary’s Correctional Center			88100		18,735,467Denmar Correctional Center			88200		6,619,382Ohio County Correctional Center			88300		2,868,233Mt. Olive Correctional Complex			88800		29,202,306Lakin Correctional Center			89600		14,045,574BRIM Premium			91300		2,527,657	Total					$	354,622,611		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Children’s Protection Act (fund 0450, appropriation 09000), Unclassified – Surplus (fund 0450, appropriation 09700), Current Expenses (fund 0450, appropriation 13000), Facilities Planning and Administration (fund 0450, appropriation 38600), Inmate Medical Expenses (fund 0450, appropriation 53500), Capital Improvements – Surplus (fund 0450, appropriation 66100), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0450, appropriation 75500), Security System Improvements – Surplus (fund 0450, appropriation 75501), Roof Repairs and Mechanical System Upgrades (fund 0450, appropriation 75502), and Stevens Correctional Center – Surplus (fund 0450, appropriation 79500)  at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Commissioner of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall have the authority to transfer between appropriations.		From the above appropriation to Current Expenses (fund 0450, appropriation 13000), payment shall be made to house Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation inmates in federal, county, and/or regional jails.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0450, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Regional Jails Operating Cash Control Account (fund 6678).		Any realized savings from Energy Savings Contract may be transferred to Facilities Planning and Administration (fund 0450, appropriation 38600). Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Bureau of Juvenile Services(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0570 FY 2026 Org 0608 Statewide Reporting Centers			26200	$	7,954,237Robert L. Shell Juvenile Center			26700		3,353,727Resident Medical Expenses (R)			53501		6,000,078Central Office			70100		2,157,860Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		250,000Gene Spadaro Juvenile Center			79300		3,582,637BRIM Premium			91300		115,967Kenneth Honey Rubenstein Juvenile Center (R)			98000		7,045,294Vicki Douglas Juvenile Center			98100		3,451,194Northern Regional Juvenile Center			98200		2,876,302Lorrie Yeager Jr. Juvenile Center			98300		3,300,206Sam Perdue Juvenile Center			98400		3,487,390Tiger Morton Center			98500		3,572,552Donald R. Kuhn Juvenile Center			98600		6,826,359J.M. “Chick” Buckbee Juvenile Center			98700		3,497,404	Total					$	57,471,207		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Resident Medical Expenses (fund 0570, appropriation 53501), Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0570, appropriation 75500), Roof Repairs and Mechanical System Upgrades (fund 0570, appropriation 75502), and Kenneth Honey Rubenstein Juvenile Center (fund 0570, appropriation 98000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The Director of Juvenile Services shall have the authority to transfer between appropriations to the individual juvenile centers above including Statewide Reporting Centers and Central Office and may transfer funds from the individual juvenile centers to Resident Medical Expenses (fund 0570, appropriation 53501). West Virginia State Police (W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 0453 FY 2026 Org 0612 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	77,180,392Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		139,300Repairs and Alterations			06400		450,523Children’s Protection Act			09000		1,127,989Current Expenses			13000		10,384,394Trooper Class			52100		3,227,388Barracks Lease Payments			55600		237,898Communications and Other Equipment (R)			55800		1,070,968Trooper Retirement Fund			60500		14,319,315Handgun Administration Expense			74700		89,432Capital Outlay and Maintenance (R)			75500		250,000Retirement Systems – Unfunded Liability			77500		1Automated Fingerprint Identification System			89800		2,269,280BRIM Premium			91300		5,743,921	Total					$	116,490,801		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Communications and Other Equipment (fund 0453, appropriation 55800), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0453, appropriation 67700), and Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 0453, appropriation 75500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0453, appropriation 00100), an amount not less than $25,000 shall be expended to offset the costs associated with providing police services for the West Virginia State Fair. Fire Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0436 FY 2026 Org 0619 Current Expenses			13000	$	63,061 Division of Protective Services (W.V. Code Chapter 5F)Fund 0585 FY 2026 Org 0622 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,516,776Repairs and Alterations			06400		8,500Equipment (R)			07000		64,171Unclassified (R)			09900		21,991Current Expenses			13000		372,981BRIM Premium			91300		32,602	Total					$	4,017,021		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Equipment (fund 0585, appropriation 07000) and Unclassified (fund 0585, appropriation 09900) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Administrative Services – Criminal Justice Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0546 FY 2026 Org 0623 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	723,413Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,804Current Expenses			13000		133,360Victims of Crime Act (R)			21601		12,966,931Court Appointed Special Advocates			xxxxx		1,100,000Child Advocacy Centers (R)			45800		2,216,336Community Corrections (R)			56100		4,616,145Statistical Analysis Program			59700		51,495Sexual Assault Forensic Examination Commission (R)			71400		285,570Qualitative Analysis and Training for Youth Services (R)			76200		91,479Law Enforcement Professional Standards			83800		183,676Justice Reinvestment Initiative (R)			89501		2,346,044BRIM Premium			91300		2,123	Total					$	24,718,376		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Victims of Crime Act (fund 0546, appropriation 21601), Child Advocacy Centers (fund 0546, appropriation 45800), Community Corrections (fund 0546, appropriation 56100), Sexual Assault Forensic Examination Commission (fund 0546 appropriation 71400), Qualitative Analysis and Training for Youth Services (fund 0546, appropriation 76200), Justice Reinvestment Initiative (fund 0546, appropriation 89501), and Victims of Crime Act – Surplus (fund 0546, appropriation 21099) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Child Advocacy Centers (fund 0546, appropriation 45800), the Division may retain an amount not to exceed four percent of the appropriation for administrative purposes. Division of Administrative Services (W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 0619 FY 2026 Org 0623 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	5,408,574Unclassified			09900		50,000Current Expenses			13000		555,000	Total					$	6,013,574 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE Office of the Secretary (W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 0465 FY 2026 Org 0701 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	395,153Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		169,820Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,262Equipment			07000		8,000Unclassified			09900		437Current Expenses			13000		81,594Other Assets			69000		500Directed Transfer			70000		33,688,290	Total					$	34,345,056		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Unclassified – Total (fund 0465, appropriation 09600) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer shall be transferred to the Personal Income Tax Reserve Fund (fund 1313). Tax Division (W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 0470 FY 2026 Org 0702 Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	20,798,910Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		147,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		10,150Equipment			07000		54,850Tax Technology Upgrade			09400		3,700,000Unclassified (R)			09900		174,578Current Expenses (R)			13000		6,823,635Multi State Tax Commission			65300		77,958Other Assets			69000		10,000BRIM Premium			91300		15,579	Total					$	31,812,660		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0470, appropriation 00100), Unclassified (fund 0470, appropriation 09900), Current Expenses (fund 0470, appropriation 13000), and Integrated Tax Assessment System (fund 0470, appropriation 29200) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Budget Office (W.V. Code Chapter 11B)Fund 0595 FY 2026 Org 0703 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,064,630Unclassified (R)			09900		9,200Current Expenses (R)			13000		69,449	Total					$	1,143,279Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0595, appropriation 09900) and Current Expenses (fund 0595, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. West Virginia Office of Tax Appeals (W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 0593 FY 2026 Org 0709 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	998,751Unclassified			09900		5,255Current Expenses (R)			13000		229,374BRIM Premium			91300		3,062	Total					$	1,236,442		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0593, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Athletic Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0523 FY 2026 Org 0933 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	7,200Current Expenses			13000		29,611	Total					$	36,811 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – State Rail Authority(W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 0506 FY 2026 Org 0810 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	390,790Current Expenses			13000		287,707Other Assets (R)			69000		1,270,019BRIM Premium			91300		201,541	Total					$	2,150,057		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Other Assets (fund 0506, appropriation 69000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – Public Transit(W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 0510 FY 2026 Org 0810 Equipment (R)			07000	$	100,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		2,042,989Buildings (R)			25800		100,000Other Assets (R)			69000		50,000Federal Funds/Grant Match			74900		1,250,000	Total					$	3,542,989		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Equipment (fund 0510, appropriation 07000), Current Expenses (fund 0510, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 0510, appropriation 25800), and Other Assets (fund 0510, appropriation 69000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0510, appropriation 13000), $30,000 will be used to support the Sistersville Ferry. 		The appropriation for Federal Funds/ Grant Match (fund 0510, appropriation 74900) shall be used to expand public transportation in, but not limited to, Tucker and Morgan counties. Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – (W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 0580 FY 2026 Org 0810Personal Services and Employee Benefits (R)			00100	$	723,563Current Expenses (R)			13000		650,000BRIM Premium			91300		7,500	Total					$	1,381,063		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 0580, appropriation 00100) and Current Expenses (fund 0580, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – Aeronautics Commission(W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 0582 FY 2026 Org 0810 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	238,109Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Current Expenses (R)			13000		1,791,839BRIM Premium			91300		4,438	Total					$	2,034,486		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0582, appropriation 13000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 0582, appropriation 13000) $1,000,000 shall be used for the North Central West Virginia Airport apron and taxiway project.  DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ ASSISTANCE Department of Veterans’ Assistance (W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 0456 FY 2026 Org 0613 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,696,166Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		110,880Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Unclassified			09900		20,000Current Expenses			13000		236,450Veterans’ Field Offices (R)			22800		585,550Veterans’ Nursing Home (R)			28600		11,443,175Veterans’ Toll Free Assistance Line			32800		2,015Veterans’ Reeducation Assistance (R)			32900		10,000Veterans’ Grant Program (R)			34200		335,000Veterans’ Grave Markers			47300		10,000Veterans’ Cemetery (R)			80800		425,279BRIM Premium			91300		50,000	Total					$	15,929,515		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Veterans’ Field Offices (fund 0456, appropriation 22800), Buildings (fund 0456, appropriation 25800), Buildings – Surplus (fund 0456, appropriation 25899), Veterans’ Nursing Home (fund 0456, appropriation 28600), Veterans’ Reeducation Assistance (fund 0456, appropriation 32900), Veterans’ Grant Program (fund 0456, appropriation 34200), Veterans’ Bonus – Surplus (fund 0456, appropriation 34400), Veterans’ Cemetery (fund 0456, appropriation 80800), and Educational Opportunities for Children of Deceased Veterans (fund 0456, appropriation 85400) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Department of Veterans’ Assistance – Veterans’ Home(W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 0460 FY 2026 Org 0618Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,548,950Current Expenses (R)			13000		150,944Veterans Outreach Programs			61700		214,345	Total					$	1,914,239		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Current Expenses (fund 0460, appropriation 13000) and Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0460, appropriation 67700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. BUREAU OF SENIOR SERVICES Bureau of Senior Services (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 0420 FY 2026 Org 0508 Transfer to Division of Human Services for Health Care	and Title XIX Waiver for Senior Citizens			53900	$	6,580,366		The above appropriation for Transfer to Division of Human Services for Health Care and Title XIX Waiver for Senior Citizens (fund 0420, appropriation 53900) along with the federal moneys generated thereby shall be used for reimbursement for services provided under the program.		The above appropriation is in addition to funding provided in the Lottery Senior Citizens Fund (fund 5405) for this program. WEST VIRGINIA COUNCIL FOR COMMUNITYAND TECHNICAL COLLEGE EDUCATION West Virginia Council for Community and Technical College Education – Control Account(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0596 FY 2026 Org 0420 West Virginia Council for Community	and Technical Education (R)			39200	$	766,404Community College Workforce Development (R)			87800		2,791,367College Transition Program			88700		278,222West Virginia Advance Workforce Development (R)			89300		3,126,336Technical Program Development (R)			89400		1,800,735WV Invests Grant Program (R)			89401		5,049,753Skilled Trades Apprenticeship Nontraditional Degree			XXXXX		1,033,650Community and Technical Education 	Workforce Development Grants			XXXXX		0	Total					$	14,846,467		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for West Virginia Council for Community and Technical Education (fund 0596, appropriation 39200), Capital Improvements – Surplus (fund 0596, appropriation 66100), Community College Workforce Development (fund 0596, appropriation 87800), West Virginia Advance Workforce Development (fund 0596, appropriation 89300), Technical Program Development (fund 0596, appropriation 89400), and WV Invests Grant Program (fund 0596, appropriation 89401) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Mountwest Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)						Fund 0599 FY 2026 Org 0444 Mountwest Community and Technical College			48700	$	7,070,248 New River Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0600 FY 2026 Org 0445 New River Community and Technical College			35800	$	6,900,124 Pierpont Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0597 FY 2026 Org 0446 Pierpont Community and Technical College			93000	$	8,461,049 Blue Ridge Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0601 FY 2026 Org 0447 Blue Ridge Community and Technical College			88500	$	9,545,266 West Virginia University at Parkersburg (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0351 FY 2026 Org 0464 West Virginia University – Parkersburg			47100	$	11,816,395 Southern West Virginia Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0380 FY 2026 Org 0487 Southern West Virginia Community and Technical College			44600	$	9,459,029 West Virginia Northern Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0383 FY 2026 Org 0489 West Virginia Northern Community and Technical College			44700	$	8,672,018 Eastern West Virginia Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0587 FY 2026 Org 0492 Eastern West Virginia Community and Technical College			41200	$	2,439,405 BridgeValley Community and Technical College (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0618 FY 2026 Org 0493 BridgeValley Community and Technical College			71700	$	8,931,983HIGHER EDUCATION POLICY COMMISSION Higher Education Policy Commission – Administration – Control Account(W.V. Code Chapter 18B and 18C)Fund 0589 FY 2026 Org 0441 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,945,386RHI Program and Site Support – 	RHEP Program Administration (R)			03700		80,000Mental Health Provider Loan Repayment (R)			11301		100,000Current Expenses			13000		1,096,902Higher Education Grant Program			16400		40,619,864Tuition Contract Program (R)			16500		1,533,917Underwood-Smith Scholarship Program-Student Awards			16700		1,478,349Facilities Planning and Administration			38600		1,760,254Dual Enrollment Program			42201		5,810,625Higher Education System Initiatives			48801		1,655,725PROMISE Scholarship – Transfer			80000		18,500,000HEAPS Grant Program (R)			86700		5,026,840Health Professionals’ Student Loan Program (R)			86701		547,470Directed Transfer			70000		293,500West Virginia University College of Law			xxxxx		250,000BRIM Premium			91300		17,817	Total					$	81,716,649		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for RHI Program and Site Support – RHEP Program Administration (fund 0589, 03700), Mental Health Provider Loan Repayment (fund 0589, appropriation 11301), Tuition Contract Program (fund 0589, appropriation 16500), Fire and EMS Training Program Support – Surplus (fund 0589, appropriation 31099), Dual Enrollment Program (fund 0589, appropriation 42201), Nursing Program Expansion Support – Surplus (fund 0589, appropriation 42299), HEAPS Grant Program (fund 0589, appropriation 86700), and Health Professionals’ Student Loan Program (fund 0589, appropriation 86701) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above appropriation for Facilities Planning and Administration (fund 0589, appropriation 38600) is for operational expenses of the West Virginia Regional Technology Park between construction and full occupancy.		The above appropriation for Higher Education Grant Program (fund 0589, appropriation 16400) shall be transferred to the Higher Education Grant Fund (fund 4933) established by W.V. Code §18C-5-3.		The above appropriation for Underwood-Smith Scholarship Program - Student Awards (fund 0589, appropriation 16700) shall be transferred to the Underwood-Smith Teaching Scholars Program Fund (fund 4922) established by W.V. Code §18C-4-1.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0589, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Military College Advisory Council Fund (fund XXXX).		The above appropriation for PROMISE Scholarship-Transfer (fund 0589, appropriation 80000) shall be transferred to the PROMISE Scholarship Fund (fund 4296) established by W.V. Code §18C-7-7.		The above appropriation for Dual Enrollment Program (fund 0589, appropriation 42201) shall be used for the Dual Enrollment Program established by House Bill 2005 during the 2023 Regular Session. West Virginia University – School of MedicineMedical School Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0343 FY 2026 Org 0463 WVU School of Health Science – Eastern Division			05600	$	2,449,725WVU – School of Health Sciences			17400		16,318,104WVU – School of Health Sciences – Charleston Division			17500		2,503,592Rural Health Outreach Programs (R)			37700		172,019West Virginia University School of Medicine	BRIM Subsidy			46000		1,203,087	Total					$	22,646,527		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Rural Health Outreach Programs (fund 0343, appropriation 37700) at the close of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. West Virginia University – General Administrative Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0344 FY 2026 Org 0463 West Virginia University			45900	$	96,507,802West Virginia University Land Grant Match			45101		8,644,064Jackson’s Mill (R)			46100		516,910West Virginia University Institute of Technology			47900		8,892,384State Priorities – Brownfield Professional Development (R)			53100		816,556Washington Center			xxxxx		1,500,000Energy Express (R)			86100		386,592West Virginia University – Potomac State			99400		5,307,402	Total					$	122,571,710		From the above appropriation for Jackson’s Mill (fund 0344, appropriation 46100), $250,000 shall be used for the West Virginia State Fire Training Academy and $43,000 shall be used for the West Virginia University Fire Extension Service to fund a study to improve volunteer fire departments.  		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for West Virginia University – Surplus (fund 0344, appropriation 30099), Jackson’s Mill (fund 0344, appropriation 46100), State Priorities – Brownfield Professional Development (fund 0344, appropriation 53100), National Cancer Institute - Surplus (fund 0344, appropriation 65399), and Energy Express (fund 0344, appropriation 86100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Marshall University – School of Medicine(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0347 FY 2026 Org 0471 Marshall Medical School			17300	$	8,466,806Rural Health Outreach Program (R)			37700		161,176Forensic Lab (R)			37701		227,859Center for Rural Health (R)			37702		170,920Marshall University Medical School BRIM Subsidy			44900		872,612	Total					$	9,899,373		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Rural Health Outreach Programs (fund 0347, appropriation 37700), Forensic Lab (fund 0347, appropriation 37701), and Center for Rural Health (fund 0347, appropriation 37702) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Marshall University – General Administration Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0348 FY 2026 Org 0471 Marshall University			44800	$	53,963,819Marshall University Minority Health Institute			42301		100,000Luke Lee Listening Language and Learning Lab (R)			44801		159,287Vista E-Learning (R)			51900		229,019National Youth Science Camp			13200		1,000,000State Priorities – Brownfield Professional Development (R)			53100		809,606Marshall University Graduate College Writing Project (R)			80700		25,412WV Autism Training Center (R)			93200		2,011,949	Total					$	58,299,092		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Luke Lee Listening Language and Learning Lab (fund 0348, appropriation 44801), VISTA E-Learning (fund 0348, appropriation 51900), State Priorities – Brownfield Professional Development (fund 0348, appropriation 53100), Marshall University Graduate College Writing Project (fund 0348, appropriation 80700), WV Autism Training Center (fund 0348, appropriation 93200), Marshall University Minority Health Institute (fund 0348, appropriation 42301), and Marshall University Cybersecurity Program – Surplus (fund 0348, appropriation 42302) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0336 FY 2026 Org 0476 West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine			17200	$	5,696,122Rural Health Outreach Programs (R)			37700		176,190West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine	BRIM Subsidy			40300		153,405Rural Health Initiative – Medical Schools Support			58100		421,157	Total					$	6,446,874		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine – Surplus (fund 0336, appropriation 17299), Rural Health Outreach Programs (fund 0336, appropriation 37700), and Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0336, appropriation 67700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bluefield State University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0354 FY 2026 Org 0482 Bluefield State University			40800	$	7,094,661 Concord University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0357 FY 2026 Org 0483 Concord University			41000	$	11,494,967 Fairmont State University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0360 FY 2026 Org 0484 Fairmont State University			41400	$	20,634,815 Glenville State University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0363 FY 2026 Org 0485 Glenville State University			42800	$	7,591,844 Shepherd University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0366 FY 2026 Org 0486 Shepherd University			43200	$	13,704,338 West Liberty University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0370 FY 2026 Org 0488 West Liberty University			43900	$	10,416,184 West Virginia State University (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0373 FY 2026 Org 0490 West Virginia State University			44100	$	11,989,550Healthy Grandfamilies (R)			62101		800,000LPN to BSN			xxxxx		250,000West Virginia State University Land Grant Match			95600		5,000,000	Total					$	18,039,550		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Healthy Grandfamilies (fund 0373, appropriation 62101) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Higher Education Policy Commission – Administration -West Virginia Network for Educational Telecomputing (WVNET)(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 0551 FY 2026 Org 0495 WVNET			16900	$	1,977,941 MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS Adjutant General – State Militia(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 0433 FY 2026 Org 0603 Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201	$	189,000Unclassified (R)			09900		106,798College Education Fund			23200		2,500,000Civil Air Patrol			23400		199,664Armory Board Transfer			70015		2,317,555Mountaineer ChalleNGe Academy			70900		3,614,600SEARCH Director			xxxxx		70,000Military Authority (R)			74800		6,681,954Drug Enforcement and Support			74801		1,451,713	Total					$	17,131,284		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Unclassified (fund 0433, appropriation 09900), Recruit WV Employment Program – Surplus (fund 0433, appropriation 30799), Capital Outlay, Repairs and Equipment – Surplus (fund 0433, appropriation 67700), Armory Board Transfers – Surplus (fund 0433, appropriation 70299), Mountaineer ChalleNGe Academy (fund 0433, appropriation 70900), Military Authority (fund 0433, appropriation 74800), Military Authority – Surplus (fund 0433, appropriation 74899), and Federal Funds/Grant Match (fund 0433, appropriation 85700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriations an amount approved by the Adjutant General may be transferred to the State Armory Board for operation and maintenance of National Guard Armories.		The Adjutant General shall have the authority to transfer between appropriations.		From the above appropriation and other state and federal funding, the Adjutant General shall provide an amount not less than $3,614,600 to the Mountaineer ChalleNGe Academy to meet anticipated program demand. Adjutant General – Military Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 0605 FY 2026 Org 0603 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	100,000Current Expenses			13000		57,775	Total					$	157,775Total TITLE II, Section 1 – General Revenue	(Including claims against the state)					$	5,317,557,000 		Sec. 2. Appropriations from state road fund. — From the state road fund there are hereby appropriated conditionally upon the fulfillment of the provisions set forth in Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code the following amounts, as itemized, for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Division of Motor Vehicles (W.V. Code Chapters 17, 17A, 17B, 17C, 17D, 20, and 24A)Fund 9007 FY 2026 Org 0802								State				Appro-			Road				priation			Fund Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	43,505,517Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		129,500Repairs and Alterations			06400		144,000Equipment			07000		1,080,000Current Expenses			13000		27,556,730Buildings			25800		10,000Other Assets			69000		2,480,000BRIM Premium			91300		110,000	Total					$	75,015,747 Division of Highways (W.V. Code Chapters 17 and 17C)Fund 9017 FY 2026 Org 0803 Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201	$	200,000Debt Service			04000		120,000,000Maintenance			23700		700,235,315Inventory Revolving			27500		17,000,000Equipment Revolving			27600		52,950,166General Operations			27700		186,166,680Interstate Construction			27800		275,000,000Other Federal Aid Programs			27900		450,000,000Appalachian Programs			28000		250,000,000Highway Litter Control			28200		1,650,000	Total					$	2,053,202,161		The above appropriations are to be expended in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 17 and 17C of the W.V. Code.		The Commissioner of Highways shall have the authority to operate revolving funds within the State Road Fund for the operation and purchase of various types of equipment used directly and indirectly in the construction and maintenance of roads and for the purchase of inventories and materials and supplies.		There is hereby appropriated in addition to the above appropriations, sufficient money for the payment of claims, accrued or arising during this budgetary period, to be paid in accordance with Sections 17, 17a and 18, Article 2, Chapter 14 of the W.V. Code.		It is the intent of the Legislature to capture and match all federal funds available for expenditure on the Appalachian highway system at the earliest possible time. Therefore, should amounts in excess of those appropriated be required for the purposes of Appalachian Programs, funds in excess of the amount appropriated may be made available upon recommendation of the Commissioner and approval of the Governor. Further, for the purpose of Appalachian Programs, funds appropriated by appropriation may be transferred to other appropriations upon recommendation of the Commissioner and approval of the Governor.Total TITLE II, Section 2 – State Road Fund	(Including claims against the state)					$	2,129,082,658 Sec. 3. Appropriations from other funds. — From the funds designated there are hereby appropriated conditionally upon the fulfillment of the provisions set forth in Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code the following amounts, as itemized, for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. LEGISLATIVE Crime Victims Compensation Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 14)Fund 1731 FY 2026 Org 2300 				Appro-			Other				priation			Funds Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	498,020Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Current Expenses			13000		133,903Economic Loss Claim Payment Fund			33400		2,000,000Other Assets			69000		3,700	Total					$	2,636,623 JUDICIAL Supreme Court – Court Advanced Technology Subscription Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 51)Fund 1704 FY 2026 Org 2400Current Expenses			13000	$	100,000 Supreme Court – Adult Drug Court Participation Fund  (W.V. Code Chapter 62) Fund 1705 FY 2026 Org 2400 Current Expenses			13000	$	200,000 Supreme Court – Family Court Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 51)Fund 1763 FY 2026 Org 2400 Current Expenses			13000	$	900,000 Supreme Court – Court Facilities Maintenance Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 51)Fund 1766 FY 2026 Org 2400 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	70,000Current Expenses			13000		680,000Total					$	750,000 EXECUTIVE Governor’s Office – Minority Affairs Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 1058 FY 2026 Org 0100 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	239,958Martin Luther King, Jr. Holiday Celebration			03100		8,926Current Expenses			13000		453,200	Total					$	702,084 Auditor’s Office – Grant Recovery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 1205 FY 2026 Org 1200 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	2,000Equipment			07000		7,000Current Expenses			13000		191,000	Total					$	200,000 Auditor’s Office – Land Operating Fund(W.V. Code Chapters 11A, 12, and 36)Fund 1206 FY 2026 Org 1200 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	901,372Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,600Equipment			07000		426,741Unclassified			09900		15,139Current Expenses			13000		715,291Cost of Delinquent Land Sale			76800		1,841,168	Total					$	3,902,311		There is hereby appropriated from this fund, in addition to the above appropriations if needed, the necessary amount for the expenditure of funds other than Personal Services and Employee Benefits to enable the division to pay the direct expenses relating to land sales as provided in Chapter 11A of the West Virginia Code.		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of fees and collections as provided by law. Auditor’s Office – Local Government Purchasing Card Expenditure Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 6)Fund 1224 FY 2026 Org 1200 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	670,729Repairs and Alterations			06400		6,000Equipment			07000		10,805Current Expenses			13000		282,030Other Assets			69000		50,000Statutory Revenue Distribution			74100		3,500,000	Total					$	4,519,564		There is hereby appropriated from this fund, in addition to the above appropriations if needed, the amount necessary to meet the transfer of revenue distribution requirements to provide a proportionate share of rebates back to the general fund of local governments based on utilization of the program in accordance with W.V. Code §6-9-2b. Auditor’s Office – Securities Regulation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 32)Fund 1225 FY 2026 Org 1200 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,579,931Repairs and Alterations			06400		12,400Equipment			07000		594,700Unclassified			09900		31,866Current Expenses			13000		1,463,830Other Assets			69000		1,200,000	Total					$	6,882,727 Auditor’s Office – Technology Support and Acquisition Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 1233 FY 2026 Org 1200 Current Expenses			13000	$	10,000Other Assets			69000		5,000	Total					$	15,000		Fifty percent of the deposits made into this fund shall be transferred to the Treasurer’s Office – Technology Support and Acquisition Fund (fund 1329) for expenditure for the purposes described in W.V. Code §12-3-10c. Auditor’s Office – Purchasing Card Administration Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 1234 FY 2026 Org 1200 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,927,244Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,500Equipment			07000		850,000Current Expenses			13000		2,303,622Other Assets			69000		508,886Statutory Revenue Distribution			74100		8,000,000	Total					$	15,595,252		There is hereby appropriated from this fund, in addition to the above appropriations if needed, the amount necessary to meet the transfer and revenue distribution requirements to the Purchasing Improvement Fund (fund 2264), the Entrepreneurship and Innovation Investment Fund (fund 3014), the Hatfield-McCoy Regional Recreation Authority, and the State Park Operating Fund (fund 3265) per W.V. Code §12-3-10d. Auditor’s Office – Chief Inspector’s Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 6)Fund 1235 FY 2026 Org 1200 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,910,235Equipment			07000		50,000Current Expenses			13000		765,915	Total					$	4,726,150 Auditor’s Office – Private Trust Company Application Fund(W.V. Code Chapters 31 and 46)Fund 1241 FY 2026 Org 1200 Equipment			07000	$	30,000Current Expenses			13000		60,000	Total					$	90,000 Department of Agriculture – Agriculture Fees Fund(W.V. Code Chapters 19)Fund 1401 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,102,402Repairs and Alterations			06400		158,500Equipment			07000		436,209Unclassified			09900		37,425Current Expenses			13000		1,856,184Other Assets			69000		10,000	Total					$	5,600,720 Department of Agriculture – West Virginia Rural Rehabilitation Program(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1408 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	85,293Unclassified			09900		10,476Current Expenses			13000		2,200,000	Total					$	2,295,769 Department of Agriculture – General John McCausland Memorial Farm Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1409 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	85,545Repairs and Alterations			06400		36,400Equipment			07000		15,000Unclassified			09900		2,100Current Expenses			13000		89,500	Total					$	228,545		The above appropriations shall be expended in accordance with Article 26, Chapter 19 of the Code. Department of Agriculture – Farm Operating Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1412 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	932,035Repairs and Alterations			06400		388,722Equipment			07000		399,393Unclassified			09900		15,173Current Expenses			13000		1,367,464Other Assets			69000		20,000	Total					$	3,122,787 Department of Agriculture – Capital Improvements Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1413 FY 2026 Org 1400 Repairs and Alterations			06400		250,000Equipment			07000		350,000Unclassified			09900		20,000Current Expenses			13000		510,000Buildings			25800		670,000Other Assets			69000		200,000	Total					$	2,000,000 Department of Agriculture – Agriculture Development Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1423 FY 2026 Org 1400 Current Expenses			13000	$	100,000 Department of Agriculture – Donated Food Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1446 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,163,783Repairs and Alterations			06400		128,500Equipment			07000		10,000Unclassified			09900		45,807Current Expenses			13000		3,410,542Other Assets			69000		27,000Land				73000		250,000	Total					$	5,035,632 Department of Agriculture – Integrated Predation Management Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 7)Fund 1465 FY 2026 Org 1400 Current Expenses			13000	$	112,500 Department of Agriculture – West Virginia Spay Neuter Assistance Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1481 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	100,000Current Expenses			13000		1,000,000	Total					$	1,100,000 Department of Agriculture – Veterans and Warriors to Agriculture Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 1483 FY 2026 Org 1400 Current Expenses			13000	$	7,500 Department of Agriculture – State FFA-FHA Camp and Conference Center(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 1484 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,289,160Repairs and Alterations			06400		82,500Equipment			07000		76,000Unclassified			09900		17,000Current Expenses			13000		1,143,306Buildings			25800		1,000Other Assets			69000		10,000Land				73000		1,000	Total					$	2,619,966 Attorney General – Antitrust Enforcement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 1507 FY 2026 Org 1500 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	371,036Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		1,000Current Expenses			13000		148,803	Total					$	521,839 Attorney General – Preneed Burial Contract Regulation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 1513 FY 2026 Org 1500 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	240,959Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		1,000Current Expenses			13000		54,615	Total					$	297,574 Attorney General – Preneed Funeral Guarantee Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 1514 FY 2026 Org 1500 Current Expenses			13000	$	901,135 Secretary of State – Service Fees and Collection Account(W.V. Code Chapters 3, 5, and 59)Fund 1612 FY 2026 Org 1600 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,196,867Unclassified			09900		4,524Current Expenses			13000		8,036	Total					$	1,209,427 Secretary of State – General Administrative Fees Account(W.V. Code Chapters 3, 5, and 59)Fund 1617 FY 2026 Org 1600 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,248,467Unclassified			09900		25,529Current Expenses			13000		1,276,716Technology Improvements			59900		1,370,000	Total					$	5,920,712 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION Department of Administration – Office of the Secretary – Tobacco Settlement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 4)Fund 2041 FY 2026 Org 0201 Tobacco Settlement Securitization Trustee Passthru			65000	$	80,000,000 Department of Administration – Office of the Secretary – Employee Pension and Health Care Benefit Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 2044 FY 2026 Org 0201 Current Expenses			13000	$	39,831,000		The above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 2044, appropriation 13000) shall be transferred to the Consolidated Public Retirement Board – Teachers’ Accumulation Fund (fund 2600). Department of Administration – Division of Finance – Shared Services Section Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2020 FY 2026 Org 0209 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,638,791Current Expenses			13000		500,000	Total					$	2,138,791 Division of Purchasing – Vendor Fee Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2263 FY 2026 Org 0213 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	611,378Current Expenses			13000		9,115BRIM Premium			91300		810	Total					$	621,303 Division of Purchasing – Purchasing Improvement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2264 FY 2026 Org 0213 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,060,880Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		500Unclassified			09900		5,562Current Expenses			13000		492,066Other Assets			69000		500BRIM Premium			91300		850	Total					$	1,560,858 Travel Management – Aviation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2302 FY 2026 Org 0215 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	1,275,237Equipment			07000		1,000Unclassified			09900		1,000Current Expenses			13000		149,700Buildings			25800		100Other Assets			69000		100Land				73000		100	Total					$	1,427,237 Fleet Management Division Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2301 FY 2026 Org 0216 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	839,903Repairs and Alterations			06400		12,000Equipment			07000		800,000Unclassified			09900		4,000Current Expenses			13000		11,630,614Other Assets			69000		2,000	Total					$	13,288,517 Division of Personnel (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 2440 FY 2026 Org 0222 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	5,034,147Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		122,500Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		20,000Unclassified			09900		51,418Current Expenses			13000		1,262,813Other Assets			69000		60,000	Total					$	6,555,878		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of fees collected by the Division of Personnel. West Virginia Prosecuting Attorneys Institute (W.V. Code Chapter 7)Fund 2521 FY 2026 Org 0228 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	139,779Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		119,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		600Equipment			07000		500Unclassified			09900		4,023Current Expenses			13000		297,528Other Assets			69000		500	Total					$	561,930 Office of Technology – Office of Technology Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2220 FY 2026 Org 0231 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	24,213,297Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		2,100,000Unclassified			09900		351,068Current Expenses			13000		57,927,608Other Assets			69000		1,055,000	Total					$	85,647,973 Office of Technology – Technology Infrastructure Reinvestment Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 31)Fund 2209 FY 2026 Org 0231 Current Expenses			13000	$	400,000 DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE Division of Forestry (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 3081 FY 2026 Org 0305 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	224,509Repairs and Alterations			06400		53,000Equipment			07000		300,000Current Expenses			13000		439,830	Total					$	1,017,339 Division of Forestry – Timbering Operations Enforcement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 3082 FY 2026 Org 0305 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	265,835Repairs and Alterations			06400		11,250Current Expenses			13000		54,873	Total					$	331,958 Division of Forestry – Severance Tax Operations(W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 3084 FY 2026 Org 0305 Current Expenses			13000	$	282,614 Geological and Economic Survey – Geological and Analytical Services Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 3100 FY 2026 Org 0306 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	37,966Repairs and Alterations			06400		50,000Equipment			07000		20,000Unclassified			09900		2,182Current Expenses			13000		141,631Other Assets			69000		10,000	Total					$	261,779		The above appropriations shall be used in accordance with W.V. Code §29-2-4. Office of Energy – Energy Assistance(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3010 FY 2026 Org 0307 Energy Assistance - Total			64700	$	7,211 Division of Economic Development – Broadband Enhancement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 31G)Fund 3013 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	133,072Current Expenses			13000		1,648,318	Total					$	1,781,390 Division of Economic Development – Entrepreneurship and Innovation Investment Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3014 FY 2026 Org 0307 Entrepreneurship and Innovation Investment Fund			70301	$	1,500,000 Division of Economic Development – Broadband Development Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 31G)Fund 3034 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	687,121Unclassified			09900		2,000,000Current Expenses			13000		235,302,925	Total					$	237,990,046 Division of Economic Development – Office of Coalfield Community Development(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3162 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	440,848Unclassified			09900		8,300Current Expenses			13000		399,191	Total					$	848,339 Division of Labor – West Virginia Jobs Act Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3176 FY 2026 Org 0308 Equipment			07000	$	25,000Current Expenses			13000		75,000	Total					$	100,000 Division of Labor – HVAC Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3186 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	482,855Repairs and Alterations			06400		4,500Unclassified			09900		4,000Current Expenses			13000		82,000Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,500	Total					$	582,855 Division of Labor – Elevator Safety Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3188 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	299,995Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		129,221Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,000Unclassified			09900		2,261Current Expenses			13000		94,712Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,500	Total					$	537,689 Division of Labor – Steam Boiler Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3189 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	83,471Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,000Unclassified			09900		1,000Current Expenses			13000		20,000Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		1,000	Total					$	108,471 Division of Labor – Crane Operator Certification Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3191 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	141,576Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,500Unclassified			09900		380Current Expenses			13000		46,175Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		7,000	Total					$	197,631 Division of Labor – Amusement Rides and Amusement Attraction Safety Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3192 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	202,269Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,000Unclassified			09900		1,281Current Expenses			13000		44,520Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,500	Total					$	259,570 Division of Labor – State Manufactured Housing Administration Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3195 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	303,686Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Unclassified			09900		1,847Current Expenses			13000		43,700Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		3,404	Total					$	354,637 Division of Labor – Weights and Measures Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 3196 FY 2026 Org 0308Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	10,000Equipment			07000		10,000Unclassified			09900		1,200Current Expenses			13000		93,000BRIM Premium			91300		7,000	Total					$	121,200 Division of Labor – Bedding and Upholstery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 3198 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	156,381Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,000Unclassified			09900		2,000Current Expenses			13000		145,400Buildings			25800		1,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,700	Total					$	315,481 Division of Labor – Psychophysiological Examiners Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3199 FY 2026 Org 0308 Current Expenses			13000	$	4,000 Division of Natural Resources – License Fund – Wildlife Resources(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3200 FY 2026 Org 0310 Wildlife Resources			02300	$	11,294,856Administration			15500		2,823,713Capital Improvements and Land Purchase (R)			24800		2,823,714Law Enforcement			80600		11,294,856	Total					$	28,237,139		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of fees collected by the Division of Natural Resources.		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Improvements and Land Purchase (fund 3200, appropriation 24800) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Natural Resources – Natural Resources Game Fish and Aquatic Life Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3202 FY 2026 Org 0310 Current Expenses			13000	$	125,000 Division of Natural Resources – Nongame Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3203 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	727,138Equipment			07000		106,615Current Expenses			13000		201,810	Total					$	1,035,563 Division of Natural Resources – Planning and Development Division(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3205 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	482,802Repairs and Alterations			06400		15,016Equipment			07000		308,300Current Expenses			13000		1,056,876Buildings			25800		8,300Other Assets			69000		1,900,000Land				73000		31,700	Total					$	3,802,994 Division of Natural Resources – State Parks and Recreation Endowment Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3211 FY 2026 Org 0310 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	3,000Equipment			07000		2,000Current Expenses			13000		6,000Buildings			25800		3,000Other Assets			69000		3,504,000Land				73000		2,000	Total					$	3,520,000 Division of Natural Resources – Whitewater Study and Improvement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3253 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	76,836Equipment			07000		1,297Current Expenses			13000		64,778Buildings			25800		6,969	Total					$	149,880 Division of Natural Resources – Whitewater Advertising and Promotion Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3256 FY 2026 Org 0310 Unclassified			09900	$	200Current Expenses			13000		19,800	Total					$	20,000 Division of Miners’ Health, Safety and Training – Special Health, Safety and Training Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22A)Fund 3355 FY 2026 Org 0314 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	543,068W.V. Mining Extension Service			02600		150,000Unclassified			09900		23,700Current Expenses			13000		1,671,842	Total					$	2,388,610 Department of Commerce – Office of the Secretary –Marketing and Communications Operating Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3002 FY 2026 Org 0327 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,335,679Equipment			07000		36,000Unclassified			09900		30,000Current Expenses			13000		1,315,078	Total					$	3,716,757 State Board of Rehabilitation – Division of Rehabilitation Services –West Virginia Rehabilitation Center Special Account(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 8664 FY 2026 Org 0932 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	119,738Repairs and Alterations			06400		85,500Equipment			07000		220,000Current Expenses			13000		1,180,122Buildings			25800		150,000Other Assets			69000		150,000	Total					$	1,905,360 DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM Division of Culture and History – Public Records and Preservation Revenue Account(W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 3542 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	254,946Equipment			07000		75,000Current Expenses			13000		862,241Buildings			25800		1,000Other Assets			69000		52,328Land				73000		1,000	Total					$	1,246,515DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION State Board of Education – Strategic Staff Development(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 3937 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	35,000Unclassified			09900		26,000Current Expenses			13000		2,039,000	Total					$	2,100,000 School Building Authority – School Construction Fund(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 3952 FY 2026 Org 0404 SBA Construction Grants			24000	$	152,345,818Directed Transfer			70000		1,516,472	Total					$	153,862,290		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 3952, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the School Building Authority Fund (fund 3959) for the administrative expenses of the School Building Authority. School Building Authority (W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 3959 FY 2026 Org 0404 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,233,127Repairs and Alterations			06400		13,150Equipment			07000		26,000Current Expenses			13000		244,195	Total					$	1,516,472 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION Solid Waste Management Board (W.V. Code Chapter 22C)Fund 3288 FY 2026 Org 0312 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	922,334Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		5,000Current Expenses			13000		2,059,457Other Assets			69000		4,403	Total					$	2,992,194 Division of Environmental Protection – Hazardous Waste Management Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3023 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	831,098Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		1,505Unclassified			09900		8,072Current Expenses			13000		155,969Other Assets			69000		2,000	Total					$	999,144 Division of Environmental Protection – Air Pollution Education and Environment Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3024 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	590,995Repairs and Alterations			06400		13,000Equipment			07000		53,105Unclassified			09900		12,919Current Expenses			13000		612,291Other Assets			69000		20,000	Total					$	1,302,310 Division of Environmental Protection – Special Reclamation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3321 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,778,866Repairs and Alterations			06400		79,950Equipment			07000		130,192Current Expenses			13000		16,185,006Other Assets			69000		32,000	Total					$	18,206,014 Division of Environmental Protection – Oil and Gas Reclamation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3322 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	562,296Current Expenses			13000		956,094	Total					$	1,518,390 Division of Environmental Protection – Oil and Gas Operating Permit and Processing Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3323 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,080,953Repairs and Alterations			06400		9,500Equipment			07000		230,500Unclassified			09900		30,700Current Expenses			13000		937,300Other Assets			69000		500	Total					$	4,289,453 Division of Environmental Protection – Mining and Reclamation Operations Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3324 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,774,699Repairs and Alterations			06400		60,260Equipment			07000		83,000Unclassified			09900		920Current Expenses			13000		1,479,231Other Assets			69000		57,500	Total					$	4,455,610 Division of Environmental Protection – Underground Storage TankAdministrative Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3325 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	503,574Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,350Equipment			07000		3,610Unclassified			09900		7,520Current Expenses			13000		318,420Other Assets			69000		3,500	Total					$	841,974 Division of Environmental Protection – Hazardous Waste Emergency Response Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3331 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	354,585Repairs and Alterations			06400		7,014Equipment			07000		9,000Unclassified			09900		10,616Current Expenses			13000		767,905Other Assets			69000		3,500	Total					$	1,152,620 Division of Environmental Protection – Solid Waste Reclamation andEnvironmental Response Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3332 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	904,165Repairs and Alterations			06400		25,000Equipment			07000		106,500Unclassified			09900		22,900Current Expenses			13000		3,929,737Buildings…………………………………………………………….			25800	                     500Other Assets			69000		1,000	Total					$	4,989,802 Division of Environmental Protection – Solid Waste Enforcement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3333 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,572,719Repairs and Alterations			06400		30,930Equipment			07000		23,356Unclassified			09900		28,460Current Expenses			13000		932,229Other Assets			69000		20,554	Total					$	4,608,248 Division of Environmental Protection – Air Pollution Control Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3336 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	6,252,446Repairs and Alterations			06400		84,045Equipment			07000		103,601Unclassified			09900		70,572Current Expenses			13000		1,669,467Other Assets			69000		52,951	Total					$	8,233,082 Division of Environmental Protection – Environmental LaboratoryCertification Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3340 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	389,614Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Unclassified			09900		1,120Current Expenses			13000		201,146Other Assets			69000		163,000	Total					$	755,880 Division of Environmental Protection – Stream Restoration Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3349 FY 2026 Org 0313 Current Expenses			13000	$	3,682,076 Division of Environmental Protection – Litter Control Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3486 FY 2026 Org 0313 Current Expenses			13000	$	60,000 Division of Environmental Protection – Recycling Assistance Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3487 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	717,788Repairs and Alterations			06400		800Equipment			07000		500Unclassified			09900		400Current Expenses			13000		2,754,258Other Assets			69000		2,500	Total					$	3,476,246 Division of Environmental Protection – Mountaintop Removal Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 3490 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	858,694Repairs and Alterations			06400		27,612Equipment			07000		23,500Unclassified			09900		1,180Current Expenses			13000		390,907Other Assets			69000		11,520	Total					$	1,313,413 Oil and Gas Conservation Commission – Special Oil and Gas Conservation Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22C)Fund 3371 FY 2026 Org 0315 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	171,356Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		9,481Current Expenses			13000		161,225Other Assets			69000		1,500	Total					$	344,562 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH Department of Health – Emergency Medical Service Workers Salary Enhancement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5049 FY 2026 Org 0506 Current Expenses			13000	$	8,000,000Crisis Training			xxxxx		2,000,000		Total					$	10,000,000 Department of Health – The Vital Statistics Account(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5144 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,198,160Unclassified			09900		15,500Current Expenses			13000		3,557,788	Total					$	4,771,448 Department of Health – Laboratory Services Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5163 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,083,838Unclassified			09900		18,114Current Expenses			13000		2,209,105	Total					$	3,311,057 Department of Health – Hepatitis B Vaccine(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5183 FY 2026 Org 0506 Current Expenses			13000	$	9,740 Department of Health – Lead Abatement Account(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5204 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	19,100Unclassified			09900		373Current Expenses			13000		17,875	Total					$	37,348 Department of Health – West Virginia Birth-to-Three Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5214 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	769,278Unclassified			09900		223,999Current Expenses			13000		44,881,617	Total					$	45,874,894 Department of Health – Tobacco Control Special Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5218 FY 2026 Org 0506 Current Expenses			13000	$	7,579 Department of Health – Medical Cannabis Program Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16A)Fund 5420 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	509,658Current Expenses			13000		2,046,040	Total					$	2,555,698 West Virginia Health Care Authority – Health Care Cost Review Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5375 FY 2026 Org 0507 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	200,000Unclassified			09900		7,500Current Expenses			13000		542,586	Total					$	750,086		The above appropriation is to be expended in accordance with and pursuant to the provisions of W.V. Code §16-29B and from the special revolving fund designated Health Care Cost Review Fund. West Virginia Health Care Authority – Certificate of Need Program Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5377 FY 2026 Org 0507 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	555,842Unclassified			09900		9,481Current Expenses			13000		382,786	Total					$	948,109 Office of the Inspector General – The Health Facility Licensing Account(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5172 FY 2026 Org 0513 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	712,839Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Equipment			07000		100Unclassified			09900		7,113Current Expenses			13000		97,947Other Assets			69000		100	Total					$	818,199DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES Department of Human Services – Health Care Provider Tax – Medicaid State Share Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 5090 FY 2026 Org 0511 Medical Services			18900	$	493,594,315Medical Services Administrative Costs			78900		268,451	Total					$	493,862,766		The above appropriation for Medical Services Administrative Costs (fund 5090, appropriation 78900) shall be transferred to a special revenue account in the treasury for use by the Department of Human Services for administrative purposes. The remainder of all moneys deposited in the fund shall be transferred to the Medical Services Program Fund (fund 5084). Department of Human Services – Child Support Enforcement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 48A)Fund 5094 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	27,809,509Unclassified			09900		380,000Current Expenses			13000		12,810,491	Total					$	41,000,000 Department of Human Services – Ryan Brown Addiction Prevention and Recovery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 5111 FY 2026 Org 0511 Current Expenses			13000	$	10,667,392 Department of Human Services – Medical Services Trust Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 9)Fund 5185 FY 2026 Org 0511 Medical Services			18900	$	67,000,000Medical Services Administrative Costs			78900		738,149	Total					$	67,738,149		The above appropriation to Medical Services shall be used to provide state match of Medicaid expenditures as defined and authorized in subsection (c) of W.V. Code §9-4A-2a. Expenditures from the fund are limited to the following: payment of backlogged billings, funding for services to future federally mandated population groups and payment of the required state match for Medicaid disproportionate share payments. The remainder of all moneys deposited in the fund shall be transferred to the Department of Human Services accounts. Department of Human Services – James “Tiger” Morton Catastrophic Illness Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5454 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	136,984Unclassified			09900		4,000Current Expenses			13000		396,000	Total					$	536,984 Department of Human Services – Domestic Violence Legal Services Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 48)Fund 5455 FY 2026 Org 0511 Current Expenses			13000	$	900,000 Department of Human Services – West Virginia Works Separate State College Program Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 9)Fund 5467 FY 2026 Org 0511 Current Expenses			13000	$	500,000 Department of Human Services – West Virginia Works Separate State Two-Parent Program Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 9)Fund 5468 FY 2026 Org 0511 Current Expenses			13000	$	1,500,000 Department of Human Services – Marriage Education Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 9)Fund 5490 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	10,000Current Expenses			13000		25,000	Total					$	35,000DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FACILITIES Department of Health Facilities – Hospital Services Revenue AccountSpecial FundCapital Improvement, Renovation and Operations(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5156 FY 2026 Org 0512 Institutional Facilities Operations			33500	$	59,195,646Medical Services Trust Fund – Transfer			51200		27,800,000	Total					$	86,995,646		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the Hospital Services Revenue Account Special Fund created by W.V. Code §16-1-13, and shall be used for operating expenses and for improvements in connection with existing facilities.		Additional funds have been appropriated from General Revenue for the operation of the institutional facilities. 		Necessary funds from the above appropriation for Institutional Facilities Operations may be used for medical facilities operations, either in connection with this fund or in connection with the appropriations designated for Hopemont Hospital, Lakin Hospital, John Manchin Senior Health Care Center, Jackie Withrow Hospital, Welch Community Hospital, William R. Sharpe Jr. Hospital, Mildred Mitchell-Bateman Hospital, and William R. Sharpe Jr. Hospital – Transitional Living Facility. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY Department of Homeland Security – Office of the Secretary – Law-Enforcement, Safety and Emergency WorkerFuneral Expense Payment Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6003 FY 2026 Org 0601 Current Expenses			13000	$	32,000 Division of Emergency Management – Statewide Interoperable Radio Network Account(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6208 FY 2026 Org 0606 Current Expenses			13000	$	80,000 Division of Emergency Management – West Virginia Interoperable Radio Project(W.V. Code Chapter 24)Fund 6295 FY 2026 Org 0606 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	950,000Equipment			07000		550,000Unclassified			09900		20,000Current Expenses			13000		3,980,000	Total					$	5,500,000 Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Parolee Supervision Fees(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 6362 FY 2026 Org 0608 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,247,729Equipment			07000		30,000Unclassified			09900		9,804Current Expenses			13000		758,480Other Assets			69000		40,129	Total					$	2,086,142 Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 6675 FY 2026 Org 0608 Debt Service			04000		100,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000,000Equipment			07000		100,000Unclassified			09900		100,000Current Expenses			13000		245,472Buildings			25800		15,000,000	Total					$	16,545,472 West Virginia State Police – Motor Vehicle Inspection Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 17C)Fund 6501 FY 2026 Org 0612 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,092,049Repairs and Alterations			06400		204,500Equipment			07000		3,770,751Current Expenses			13000		1,488,211Buildings			25800		534,000Other Assets			69000		5,000	Total					$	8,094,511		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of fees collected for inspection stickers as provided by law. West Virginia State Police – Forensic Laboratory Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6511 FY 2026 Org 0612 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,637,078Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		545,000Current Expenses			13000		90,000	Total					$	2,277,078 West Virginia State Police – Drunk Driving Prevention Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6513 FY 2026 Org 0612 Current Expenses			13000	$	2,827,000		The total amount of this appropriations shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of receipts collected pursuant to W.V. Code §11-15-9a and 16 and paid into a revolving fund account in the State Treasury. West Virginia State Police – Surplus Real Property Proceeds Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6516 FY 2026 Org 0612 Buildings			25800	$	1,022,778Land				73000		1,000	Total					$	1,023,778 West Virginia State Police – Surplus Transfer Account(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6519 FY 2026 Org 0612 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	20,000Equipment			07000		250,000Current Expenses			13000		225,000Buildings			25800		40,000Other Assets			69000		45,000	Total					$	580,000 West Virginia State Police – Central Abuse Registry Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6527 FY 2026 Org 0612 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	289,971Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		300,500Current Expenses			13000		376,443Other Assets			69000		300,500	Total					$	1,267,914 West Virginia State Police – Bail Bond Enforcer Account(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6532 FY 2026 Org 0612 Current Expenses			13000	$	8,300 West Virginia State Police – State Police Academy Post Exchange(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6544 FY 2026 Org 0612 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	40,000Current Expenses			13000	 	160,000	Total					$	200,000 Fire Commission – Fire Marshal Fees(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 6152 FY 2026 Org 0619 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,093,612Repairs and Alterations			06400		58,500Equipment			07000		440,800Unclassified			09900		3,800Current Expenses			13000		1,746,550Other Assets			69000		450,000BRIM Premium			91300		65,000	Total					$	6,858,262 Division of Administrative Services – W.V. Community Corrections Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 62)Fund 6386 FY 2026 Org 0623 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	176,985Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Unclassified			09900		750Current Expenses			13000		1,846,250 	Total					$	2,024,985 Division of Administrative Services – Court Security Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 51)Fund 6804 FY 2026 Org 0623 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	26,462Current Expenses			13000		1,478,135	Total					$	1,504,597 Division of Administrative Services – Second Chance Driver’s License Program Account(W.V. Code Chapter 17B)Fund 6810 FY 2026 Org 0623 Current Expenses			13000	$	125,000 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE Division of Financial Institutions (W.V. Code Chapter 31A)Fund 3041 FY 2026 Org 0303 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,965,127Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		119,000Equipment			07000		8,500Current Expenses			13000		720,475	Total					$	3,813,102 Office of the Secretary – State Debt Reduction Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 7007 FY 2026 Org 0701 Retirement Systems – Unfunded Liability			77500	$	20,000,000		The above appropriation for Retirement Systems – Unfunded Liability (fund 7007, appropriation 77500) shall be transferred to the School Aid Formula Funds Holding Account Fund (fund 2606). Home Rule Board Operations (W.V. Code Chapter 8)Fund 7010 FY 2026 Org 0701 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	25,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		120Equipment			07000		200Unclassified			09900		680Current Expenses			13000		42,000	Total					$	68,000 Tax Division – Reduced Cigarette Ignition PropensityStandard and Fire Prevention Act Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 7092 FY 2026 Org 0702 Equipment			07000	$	15,000Current Expenses			13000		35,000	Total					$	50,000 State Budget Office – Public Employees Insurance Reserve Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 11B)Fund 7400 FY 2026 Org 0703 Public Employees Insurance Reserve Fund – Transfer			90300	$	6,800,000		The above appropriation for Public Employees Insurance Reserve Fund – Transfer shall be transferred to the Medical Services Trust Fund (fund 5185). Insurance Commissioner – Examination Revolving Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 33)Fund 7150 FY 2026 Org 0704 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	3,000Equipment			07000		81,374Current Expenses			13000		2,139,305Buildings			25800		8,289Other Assets			69000		11,426	Total					$	2,243,394 Insurance Commissioner – Consumer Advocate(W.V. Code Chapter 33)Fund 7151 FY 2026 Org 0704 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	602,587Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		34,225Current Expenses			13000		202,152Buildings			25800		4,865Other Assets			69000		19,460	Total					$	868,289 Insurance Commissioner – Insurance Commission Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 33)Fund 7152 FY 2026 Org 0704 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	20,619,440Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		136,500Repairs and Alterations			06400		68,614Equipment			07000		2,688Current Expenses			13000		9,097,758Buildings			25800		25,000Other Assets			69000		50,000	Total					$	30,000,000 Insurance Commissioner – Insurance Fraud Prevention Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 33)Fund 7153 FY 2026 Org 0704 Current Expenses			13000	$	15,000 Insurance Commissioner – Workers’ Compensation Old Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 23)Fund 7162 FY 2026 Org 0704 Employee Benefits			01000	$	50,000Current Expenses			13000		250,500,000	Total					$	250,550,000 Insurance Commissioner – Workers’ Compensation Uninsured Employers’ Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 23)Fund 7163 FY 2026 Org 0704 Current Expenses			13000	$	15,000,000 Insurance Commissioner – Self-Insured Employer Guaranty Risk Pool(W.V. Code Chapter 23)Fund 7164 FY 2026 Org 0704 Current Expenses			13000	$	9,000,000 Insurance Commissioner – Self-Insured Employer Security Risk Pool(W.V. Code Chapter 23)Fund 7165 FY 2026 Org 0704 Current Expenses			13000	$	14,000,000 Municipal Bond Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 13)Fund 7253 FY 2026 Org 0706 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	383,671Equipment			07000		100Current Expenses			13000		154,344	Total					$	538,115 Racing Commission – Relief Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7300 FY 2026 Org 0707 Medical Expenses – Total			24500	$	154,000		The total amount of this appropriation shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of collections of license fees and fines as provided by law.		No expenditures shall be made from this fund except for hospitalization, medical care, and/or funeral expenses for persons contributing to this fund. Racing Commission – Administration and Promotion Account(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7304 FY 2026 Org 0707 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	288,127Current Expenses			13000		85,433Other Assets			69000		5,000	Total					$	378,560 Racing Commission – General Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7305 FY 2026 Org 0707 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,523,239Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		59,533Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Current Expenses			13000		497,284Other Assets			69000		40,000	Total					$	3,125,056 Racing Commission – Administration, Promotion, Education, Capital Improvementand Greyhound Adoption Programsto include Spaying and Neutering Account(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7307 FY 2026 Org 0707 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	937,171Current Expenses			13000		160,099Other Assets			69000		200,000	Total					$	1,297,270 Racing Commission – Advance Deposit Wagering Account(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7309 FY 2026 Org 0707 Current Expenses			13000	$	250,000 Alcohol Beverage Control Administration – Wine License Special Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 60)Fund 7351 FY 2026 Org 0708 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	156,111Repairs and Alterations			06400		7,263Equipment			07000		10,000Current Expenses			13000		260,436Buildings			25800		100,000Transfer Liquor Profits and Taxes			42500		30,750Other Assets			69000		2,000,100	Total					$	2,564,660		To the extent permitted by law, four classified exempt positions shall be provided from Personal Services and Employee Benefits appropriation for field auditors. Alcohol Beverage Control Administration (W.V. Code Chapter 60)Fund 7352 FY 2026 Org 0708 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	6,239,729Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		122,500Repairs and Alterations			06400		91,000Equipment			07000		108,000Current Expenses			13000		2,890,577Buildings			25800		375,100Purchase of Supplies for Resale			41900		104,000,000Transfer Liquor Profits and Taxes			42500		33,400,000Other Assets			69000		125,100Land				73000		100	Total					$	147,352,106		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of liquor revenues and any other revenues available.		The above appropriations include the salary of the Commissioner and the salaries, expenses, and equipment of administrative offices, warehouses, and inspectors.		The above appropriations include funding for the Tobacco/Alcohol Education Program.		There is hereby appropriated from liquor revenues, in addition to the above appropriations as needed, the necessary amount for the purchase of liquor as provided by law and the remittance of profits and taxes to the General Revenue Fund. State Athletic Commission Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 7009 FY 2026 Org 0933 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	29,500Current Expenses			13000		28,000	Total					$	57,500 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Division of Motor Vehicles – Dealer Recovery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 8220 FY 2026 Org 0802 Current Expenses			13000	$	189,000 Division of Motor Vehicles – Motor Vehicle Fees Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 17B)Fund 8223 FY 2026 Org 0802 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	4,478,448Repairs and Alterations			06400		16,000Equipment			07000		75,000Current Expenses			13000		4,337,712Other Assets			69000		10,000BRIM Premium			91300		110,000	Total					$	9,027,160 Division of Highways – A. James Manchin Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 8319 FY 2026 Org 0803 Current Expenses			13000	$	2,900,000 WV Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – State Rail Authority –West Virginia Commuter Rail Access Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8402 FY 2026 Org 0810 Current Expenses			13000	$	600,000DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ ASSISTANCE Veterans’ Facilities Support Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 6703 FY 2026 Org 0613 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			01000	$	99,135Current Expenses			13000		1,654,234Other Assets			69000		10,000	Total					$	1,763,369 Department of Veterans’ Assistance – W.V. Veterans’ Home – Special Revenue Operating Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 6754 FY 2026 Org 0618 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	10,600Current Expenses			13000	$	321,050	Total					$	331,650 BUREAU OF SENIOR SERVICES Bureau of Senior Services – Community Based Service Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 5409 FY 2026 Org 0508 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	160,628Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		33,547Current Expenses			13000		10,599,338	Total					$	10,793,513		The total amount of these appropriations are funded from annual table game license fees to enable the aged and disabled citizens of West Virginia to stay in their homes through the provision of home and community-based services.HIGHER EDUCATION POLICY COMMISSION Higher Education Policy Commission – System – Tuition Fee Capital Improvement Fund(Capital Improvement and Bond Retirement Fund)Control Account(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18B)Fund 4903 FY 2026 Org 0442 Debt Service			04000	$	27,411,984General Capital Expenditures			30600		5,000,000Facilities Planning and Administration			38600		479,369	Total					$	32,891,353		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the Special Capital Improvement Fund created in W.V. Code §18B-10-8. Projects are to be paid on a cash basis and made available on July 1.		The above appropriations, except for Debt Service, may be transferred to special revenue funds for capital improvement projects at the institutions. Tuition Fee Revenue Bond Construction Fund (W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18B)Fund 4906 FY 2026 Org 0442 		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay (fund 4906, appropriation 51100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The appropriation shall be paid from available unexpended cash balances and interest earnings accruing to the fund. The appropriation shall be expended at the discretion of the Higher Education Policy Commission and the funds may be allocated to any institution within the system.		The total amount of this appropriation shall be paid from the unexpended proceeds of revenue bonds previously issued pursuant to W.V. Code §18-12B-8, which have since been refunded. Higher Education Policy Commission – Military College Advisory Council Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund XXXX FY 2026 Org 0442 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	123,500Current Expenses			13000		170,000	Total					$	293,500 West Virginia University – West Virginia University Health Sciences Center(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18B)Fund 4179 FY 2026 Org 0463 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	11,795,211Repairs and Alterations			06400		425,000Equipment			07000		512,000Current Expenses			13000		4,524,300Buildings			25800		150,000Other Assets			69000		50,000	Total					$	17,456,511 Marshall University – School of Medicine(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 4271 FY 2026 Org 0471 Marshall Medical School			17300	$	5,500,000 West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine (W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 4272 FY 2026 Org 0476 West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine			17200	$	4,115,931MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists – Barbers and Beauticians Special Fund(W.V. Code Chapters 16 and 30)Fund 5425 FY 2026 Org 0505 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	607,945Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Current Expenses			13000		234,969	Total					$	847,914		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of collections made by the Board of Barbers and Cosmetologists as provided by law. Hospital Finance Authority – Hospital Finance Authority Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 5475 FY 2026 Org 0509 Personal Services and Employee Benefits		 	00100	$	10,000Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		93,339Unclassified			09900		1,501Current Expenses			13000		55,268	Total					$	160,108		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of fees and collections as provided by Article 29A, Chapter 16 of the W.V. Code. State Armory Board – General Armory Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 6057 FY 2026 Org 0603 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,690,382Repairs and Alterations			06400		385,652Equipment			07000		250,000Current Expenses			13000		650,000Buildings			25800		520,820Other Assets			69000		350,000Land				73000		200,000	Total					$	4,046,854		From the above appropriations, the Adjutant General may receive and expend funds to conduct operations and activities to include functions of the Military Authority. The Adjutant General may transfer funds between appropriations, except no funds may be transferred to Personal Services and Employee Benefits (fund 6057, appropriation 00100). W.V. State Board of Examiners for Licensed Practical Nurses – Licensed Practical Nurses(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8517 FY 2026 Org 0906 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,002,286Current Expenses			13000		253,007	Total					$	1,255,293 W.V. Board of Examiners for Registered Professional Nurses – Registered Professional Nurses(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8520 FY 2026 Org 0907 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,502,835Repairs and Alterations			06400		3,000Equipment			07000		30,000Current Expenses			13000		451,155Other Assets			69000		4,500	Total					$	1,991,490 Public Service Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 24)Fund 8623 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	14,410,245Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		318,640Repairs and Alterations			06400		120,000Equipment			07000		160,000Unclassified			09900		147,643Current Expenses			13000		2,507,202Buildings			25800		10PSC Weight Enforcement			34500		5,199,295Land				73000		10BRIM Premium			91300		172,216	Total					$	23,035,261		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of collections for special license fees from public service corporations as provided by law.		The Public Service Commission is authorized to transfer up to $500,000 from this fund to meet the expected deficiencies in the Motor Carrier Division (fund 8625) due to the amendment and reenactment of W.V. Code §24A-3-1 by Enrolled House Bill Number 2715, Regular Session, 1997. Public Service Commission – Gas Pipeline Division – Public Service Commission Pipeline Safety Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 24B)Fund 8624 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	394,133Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		11,949Repairs and Alterations			06400		4,000Unclassified			09900		3,851Current Expenses			13000		93,115	Total					$	507,048		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of receipts collected for or by the Public Service Commission pursuant to and in the exercise of regulatory authority over pipeline companies as provided by law. Public Service Commission – Motor Carrier Division(W.V. Code Chapter 24A)Fund 8625 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,536,213Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		67,711Repairs and Alterations			06400		23,000Equipment			07000		50,000Unclassified			09900		29,233Current Expenses			13000		577,557	Total					$	3,283,714		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from a special revenue fund out of receipts collected for or by the Public Service Commission pursuant to and in the exercise of regulatory authority over motor carriers as provided by law. Public Service Commission – Consumer Advocate Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 24)Fund 8627 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,212,911Equipment			07000		9,872Current Expenses			13000		536,472BRIM Premium			91300		4,660	Total					$	1,763,915		The total amount of these appropriations shall be supported by cash from a special revenue fund out of collections made by the Public Service Commission. Real Estate Commission – Real Estate License Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8635 FY 2026 Org 0927 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	665,295Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,500Equipment			07000		5,000Current Expenses			13000		293,122	Total					$	965,917		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid out of collections of license fees as provided by law. W.V. Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology – Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Operating Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8646 FY 2026 Org 0930Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	129,595Current Expenses			13000		63,637	Total					$	193,232 W.V. Board of Respiratory Care – Board of Respiratory Care Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8676 FY 2026 Org 0935 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	125,073Current Expenses			13000		73,143	Total					$	198,216 W.V. Board of Licensed Dietitians – Dietitians Licensure Board Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8680 FY 2026 Org 0936 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	45,219Current Expenses			13000		20,250	Total					$	65,469 Massage Therapy Licensure Board – Massage Therapist Board Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 8671 FY 2026 Org 0938 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	122,310Current Expenses			13000		47,388	Total					$	169,698 Board of Medicine – Medical Licensing Board Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 30)Fund 9070 FY 2026 Org 0945 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,687,578Repairs and Alterations			06400		8,000Current Expenses			13000		1,339,814	Total					$	3,035,392 West Virginia Enterprise Resource Planning Board – Enterprise Resource Planning System Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 9080 FY 2026 Org 0947 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	5,690,654Repairs and Alterations			06400		300Equipment			07000		502,000Unclassified			09900		132,000Current Expenses			13000		19,214,993Buildings			25800		2,000Other Assets			69000		2,004,500	Total					$	27,546,447 Board of Treasury Investments – Board of Treasury Investments Fee Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 12)Fund 9152 FY 2026 Org 0950 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	982,714Unclassified			09900		14,850Current Expenses			13000		580,889BRIM Premium			91300		31,547Fees of Custodians, Fund Advisors and Fund Managers			93800		5,500,000	Total					$	7,110,000		There is hereby appropriated from this fund, in addition to the above appropriation if needed, an amount of funds necessary for the Board of Treasury Investments to pay the fees and expenses of custodians, fund advisors, and fund managers for the consolidated fund of the State as provided in Article 6C, Chapter 12 of the W.V. Code.		The total amount of these appropriations shall be paid from the special revenue fund out of fees and collections as provided by law. Contractor Licensing Board Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 21)Fund 3187 FY 2026 Org 0951 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,559,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		10,000Unclassified			09900		21,000Current Expenses			13000		500,000BRIM Premium			91300		8,500	Total					$	3,098,500Total TITLE II, Section 3 – Other Funds	(Including claims against the state)					$	2,315,143,753  Sec. 4. Appropriations from lottery net profits. — Net profits of the lottery are to be deposited by the Director of the Lottery to the following accounts in the amounts indicated. The Director of the Lottery shall prorate each deposit of net profits in the proportion the appropriation for each account bears to the total of the appropriations for all accounts.		After first satisfying the requirements for Fund 2252, Fund 3963, and Fund 4908 pursuant to W.V. Code §29-22-18, the Director of the Lottery shall make available from the remaining net profits of the lottery any amounts needed to pay debt service for which an appropriation is made for Fund 9065, Fund 4297, Fund 3390, Fund 3514, Fund 9067, and Fund 9068 and is authorized to transfer any such amounts to Fund 9065, Fund 4297, Fund 3390, Fund 3514, Fund 9067, and Fund 9068 for that purpose. Upon receipt of reimbursement of amounts so transferred, the Director of the Lottery shall deposit the reimbursement amounts to the following accounts as required by this section. Education, Arts, Sciences and Tourism – Debt Service Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 2252 FY 2026 Org 0211 				Appro-		Lottery				priation		Funds Debt Service – Total			31000	$	10,000,000 Department of Tourism – Office of the Secretary(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3067 FY 2026 Org 0304 Tourism – Telemarketing Center			46300	$	82,080Tourism – Advertising (R)			61800		2,422,407Tourism – Operations (R)			66200		4,612,532	Total					$	7,117,019		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Tourism – Advertising (fund 3067, appropriation 61800) and Tourism – Operations (fund 3067, appropriation 66200) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Natural Resources (W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3267 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,826,421Current Expenses			13000		26,900Pricketts Fort State Park			32400		106,560Non-Game Wildlife (R)			52700		488,588State Parks and Recreation Advertising (R)			61900		494,578	Total					$	3,943,047		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Capital Outlay – Parks (fund 3267, appropriation 28800), Non-Game Wildlife (fund 3267, appropriation 52700), and State Parks and Recreation Advertising (fund 3267, appropriation 61900) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Board of Education (W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 3951 FY 2026 Org 0402 Hope Scholarship Program			30401	$	9,197,431FBI Checks			37200		127,704Vocational Education Equipment Replacement			39300		800,000Assessment Program (R)			39600		490,439Literacy Project			89900		700,00021st Century Technology Infrastructure	Network Tools and Support (R)			93300		12,683,392	Total					$	23,998,966		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Assessment Program (fund 3951, appropriation 39600) and 21st Century Technology Infrastructure Network Tools and Support (fund 3951, appropriation 93300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. State Department of Education – School Building Authority – Debt Service Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 3963 FY 2026 Org 0404 Debt Service – Total			31000	$	15,234,900 Directed Transfer			70000		2,765,100	Total					$	18,000,000		The School Building Authority shall have the authority to transfer between the above appropriations in accordance with W.V. Code §29-22-18.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 3963, appropriation 70000) may be transferred to the Department of Education – State Board of Education – School Building Authority – School Construction Fund (fund 3952) to be used for school construction and maintenance projects. Division of Culture and History – Lottery Education Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 3534 FY 2026 Org 0432 Huntington Symphony			02700	$	59,000Preservation West Virginia (R)			09200		542,000Fairs and Festivals (R)			12200		1,347,000Commission for National and Community Service (R)			19300		396,000West Virginia Public Theater			31200		120,000Greenbrier Valley Theater			42300		115,000Theater Arts of West Virginia			46400		90,000Marshall Artists Series			51800		36,000West Virginia State Fair			65700		31,000Contemporary American Theater Festival			81100		57,000Independence Hall			81200		27,000Mountain State Forest Festival			86400		38,000WV Symphony			90700		59,000Wheeling Symphony			90800		59,000Appalachian Children’s Chorus			91600		54,000Culture and History Programs			XXXXX		190,947	Total					$	3,220,947	Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Preservation West Virginia (fund 3534, appropriation 09200), Fairs and Festivals (fund 3534, appropriation 12200), Commission for National and Community Service (fund 3534, appropriation 19300), Archeological Curation/Capital Improvements (fund 3534, appropriation 24600), Historic Preservation Grants (fund 3534, appropriation 31100), and Grants for Competitive Arts Program (fund 3534, appropriation 62400) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.From the above appropriation for Preservation West Virginia (fund 3534, appropriation 09200) funding shall be provided to the African-American Heritage Family Tree Museum (Fayette)  $2,673, Aracoma Story (Logan) $20,000, Arts Monongahela (Monongalia)  $11,881, Barbour County Arts and Humanities Council (Barbour) $891, Buffalo Creek Memorial (Logan)  $2,970, Carnegie Hall (Greenbrier)  $46,899, Ceredo Historical Society (Wayne)  $1,188, Ceredo Kenova Railroad Museum (Wayne)  $1,188, Ceredo Museum (Wayne) $720, Children's Theatre of Charleston (Kanawha)  $3,500, Chuck Mathena Center (Mercer)  $62,532, Country Music Hall of Fame and Museum (Marion)  $4,159, First Stage Children's Theater Company (Cabell) $1,188, Flannigan Murrell House (Summers)  $3,781, Fort Ashby Fort (Mineral)  $891, Fort New Salem (Harrison)  $2,198, Fort Randolph (Mason)  $2,970, General Adam Stephen Memorial Foundation (Berkeley)  $11,006, Grafton Mother's Day Shrine Committee (Taylor)  $9,029, Hardy County Tour and Crafts Association (Hardy) $11,881, Heartwood in the Hills (Calhoun) $5,040, Henderson Hall (Wood) $20,000, Heritage Farm Museum & Village (Cabell)  $29,703, Historic Fayette Theater (Fayette)  $3,267, Historic Middleway Conservancy (Jefferson)  $594, Jefferson County Black History Preservation Society  (Jefferson) $2,970, Jefferson County Historical Landmark Commission (Jefferson) $4,753, Maddie Carroll House (Cabell)  $4,455, Marshall County Historical Society (Marshall) $5,049, McCoy Theater (Hardy)  $11,881, Memorial Day Patriotic Exercise (Taylor) $20,000, Morgantown Theater Company (Monongalia)  $11,881, Nicholas Old Main Foundation (Nicholas)  $1,188, Norman Dillon Farm Museum (Berkeley)  $5,941, Oil and Gas Museum (Wood) $20,000, Old Opera House Theater Company (Jefferson)  $8,911, Parkersburg Arts Center (Wood)  $11,881, Pocahontas Historic Opera House (Pocahontas) $3,564, Raleigh County All Wars Museum (Raleigh) $5,941, Roane County 4-H and FFA Youth Livestock Program (Roane) $2,970, Robinson Grand Theatre (Harrison) $50,000, Society for the Preservation of McGrew House (Preston)  $2,079, Southern West Virginia Veterans' Museum (Raleigh) $3,393, Summers County Historic Landmark Commission (Summers) $2,970, Those Who Served War Museum (Mercer)  $2,376, Three Rivers Avian Center (Summers)  $5,311, Veterans Committee for Civic Improvement of Huntington (Wayne)  $2,970, West Virginia Museum of Glass (Lewis)  $2,970, West Virginia Music Hall of Fame (Kanawha)  $20,792, YLA Camp Horseshoe (Tucker)  $59,406, Youth Museum of Southern West Virginia (Raleigh)  $7,129From the above appropriation for Fairs and Festivals (fund 3534, appropriation 12200) funding shall be provided to A Princeton 4th (Mercer) $1,800, African-American Cultural Heritage Festival (Jefferson) $4,456, Allegheny Echo (Pocahontas) $6,683, Alpine Festival/Leaf Peepers Festival (Tucker) $6,683, American Civil War (Grant) $3,127, American Legion Post 8 Veterans Day Parade (McDowell) $1,250, Annual Don Redman Heritage Concert & Awards (Jefferson) $938, Antique Market Fair (Lewis) $1,188, Apple Butter Festival (Morgan) $3,564, Armed Forces Day-South Charleston (Kanawha) $2,000, Arthurdale Heritage New Deal Festival (Preston) $2,970, Artists of the New (Fayette) $2,000, Athens Town Fair (Mercer) $1,188, Augusta Fair (Randolph) $2,970, Autumn Harvest Fest (Monroe) $2,448, Back Home Festival (Wetzel) $5,000, Barbour County Fair (Barbour) $14,851, Battelle District Fair (Monongalia) $3,340, Battle of Dry Creek (Greenbrier) $891, Battle of Point Pleasant Memorial Committee (Mason) $2,970, Beckley Honey Festival (Raleigh) $1,710, Beckley Main Street  (Raleigh) $2,000, Belleville Homecoming   (Wood) $11,881, Berkeley County Youth Fair  (Berkeley) $10,990, BEX Arts Festival (Raleigh) $2,000, Black Heritage Festival   (Harrison) $3,564, Black Walnut Festival   (Roane) $5,940, Blacksville VFD Memorial Day Celebration (Monongalia) $1,000, Blast from the Past  (Upshur) $1,440, Boone County Labor Day Celebration  (Boone) $2,376, Boone Day (Kanawha) $1,000, Bradshaw Fall Festival   (McDowell) $1,188, Bramwell Labor Day  (Mercer) $5,000, Brandonville Heritage Day   (Preston) $1,048, Braxton County Fair  (Braxton) $6,832, Braxton County Monster Fest / West Virginia Autumn Festival  (Braxton) $1,000, Brooke County Fair  (Brooke) $2,079, Buckwheat Festival   (Preston) $5,050, Buffalo October Fest  (Putnam) $3,240, Burlington Apple Harvest Auxiliary   (Mineral) $13,821, Burlington Pumpkin Harvest Festival   (Raleigh) $2,970, Burlington Volunteer Fire and Rescue Carnival   (Mineral) $4,000, Burnsville Freedom Festival (Braxton) $1,407, Calhoun County Wood Festival  (Calhoun) $1,188, Campbell's Creek Community Fair   (Kanawha) $2,000, Cape Coalwood Festival Association   (McDowell) $1,485, Capon Bridge Founders Day Festival   (Hampshire) $500, Capon Springs Ruritan 4th of July   (Hampshire) $2,500, Cedar Grove - Annual Fallfest (Kanawha) $2,000, Celebration of America   (Monongalia) $3,564, Chapmanville Apple Butter Festival   (Logan) $684, Chapmanville Fire Department 4th of July   (Logan) $1,782, Charles Town Christmas Festival   (Jefferson) $2,970, Charles Town Heritage Festival   (Jefferson) $2,970, Cherry River Festival   (Nicholas) $3,861, Chester 4th of July Festivities   (Hancock) $2,970, Chilifest West Virginia State Chili Championship   (Cabell) $1,563, Chillin' on the Elk (Kanawha) $1,000, Christmas In Our Town   (Marion) $3,127, Christmas In Our Town   (Wetzel) $2,000, Christmas in Shepherdstown   (Jefferson) $2,376, Christmas in the Park   (Brooke) $2,970, Christmas in the Park   (Logan) $14,851, Christmas on Main Street (Hancock) $11,881, City of Dunbar Critter Dinner   (Kanawha) $6,000, Clay County Golden Delicious Apple Festival  (Clay) $4,158, Clay District Fair  (Monongalia) $3,341, Coal Field Jamboree   (Logan) $20,792, Coalton Days Fair   (Randolph) $4,158, Country Roads Festival (Wetzel) $2,000, Covered Bridge Festival (Marion) $3,000, Craigsville Fall Festival   (Nicholas) $2,079, Cruise into Princeton  (Mercer) $2,160, Culturefest World Music & Arts Festival   (Mercer) $3,200, Day in the Valley - McCutcheon Car Show (Marion) $3,000, Delbarton Homecoming   (Mingo) $2,079, Dirt Days (Mingo) $2,000, East Bank End of Summer Celebration (Kanawha) $2,000, Elbert/Filbert Reunion Festival   (McDowell) $891, Fairview 4th of July Celebration   (Marion) $684, Farmer's Day Festival   (Monroe) $2,330, Fenwick Mountain Old Time Community Festival  (Nicholas) $2,880, FestivALL Charleston   (Kanawha) $12,000, Fly in Festival (Cabell) $5,000, Follansbee Community Days   (Brooke) $4,900, Fort Gay Mountain Heritage Days   (Wayne) $2,970, Fort Henry Days   (Ohio) $3,148, Fort Henry Living History   (Ohio) $1,563, Fort New Salem Spirit of Christmas Festival   (Harrison) $2,432, Frankford Autumnfest   (Greenbrier) $2,970, Franklin Fishing Derby   (Pendleton) $10,709, Freedom Festival (Wood) $8,000, Freshwater Folk Festival   (Greenbrier) $2,970, Friends Auxiliary of W.R. Sharpe Hospital   (Lewis) $2,970, Fund for the Arts-Wine & All that Jazz Festival   (Kanawha) $8,000, Gassaway Days Celebration   (Braxton) $2,970, Gilmer County Farm Show  (Gilmer) $2,376, Great Greenbrier River Race   (Pocahontas) $5,940, Guyandotte Civil War Days   (Cabell) $5,941, Hamlin 4th of July Celebration   (Lincoln) $2,970, Hampshire Civil War Celebration Days   (Hampshire) $684, Hampshire County 4th of July Celebration  (Hampshire) $11,881, Hampshire County Fair  (Hampshire) $5,002, Hampshire County Festival (Hampshire) $2,752, Hardy County Commission - 4th of July  (Hardy) $5,940, Harvest Moon Festival (Wood) $2,000, Hatfield McCoy Matewan Reunion Festival   (Mingo) $12,330, Hatfield McCoy Reunion Festival (Logan) $2,000, Hatfield McCoy Trail National ATV and Dirt Bike Weekend   (Wyoming) $2,970, Head For the Hills Festival (Ritchie) $3,000, Head of the Dragon (McDowell) $1,500, Heritage Craft Festival   (Monroe) $3,000, Hilltop Festival   (Cabell) $1,500, Hinton Railroad Days   (Summers) $4,347, Holly River Festival   (Webster) $891, Hometown Mountain Heritage Festival   (Fayette) $2,432, Hometown Trail Days (McDowell) $1,188, Hundred 4th of July   (Wetzel) $6,207, Huntersville Traditions Day (Pocahontas) $4,000, Iaeger Town Fair   (McDowell) $891, Irish Heritage Festival of West Virginia   (Raleigh) $2,970, Irish Spring Festival   (Lewis) $684, Italian Heritage Festival-Clarksburg   (Harrison) $17,821, Jackson County Fair  (Jackson) $2,970, Jefferson County Fair Association  (Jefferson) $14,851, Jersey Mountain Ruritan Pioneer Days   (Hampshire) $684, John Henry Days Festival   (Monroe) $4,698, Johnnie Johnson Blues and Jazz Festival   (Marion) $2,970, Johnstown Community Fair   (Harrison) $1,485, Junior Heifer Preview Show   (Lewis) $1,188, Keg and Barrel Fest (Mineral) $2,000, Kenova Autumn Festival   (Wayne) $4,377, Kermit Fall Festival   (Mingo) $1,782, King Coal Festival   (Mingo) $2,970, Kingwood Downtown Street Fair and Heritage Days   (Preston) $1,188, Knights of Columbus Irish Road Bowling (Marshall) $3,000, L.Z. Rainelle West Virginia Veterans Reunion   (Greenbrier) $2,970, Larry Joe Harless Center Octoberfest Hatfield McCoy Trail   (Mingo) $5,940, Larry Joe Harless Community Center Spring Middle School Event   (Mingo) $3,000, Last Blast of Summer   (McDowell) $2,970, Lewisburg Shanghai   (Greenbrier) $1,188, Lincoln County Fall Festival  (Lincoln) $4,752, Lincoln County Winterfest  (Lincoln) $3,000, Lindside 4th of July Parade (Monroe) $1,000, Lindside Veterans' Day Parade  (Monroe) $720, Little Levels Heritage Festival   (Pocahontas) $1,188, Lost Creek Community Festival   (Harrison) $4,158, Main Street Arts Festival   (Upshur) $3,127, Main Street Martinsburg Chocolate Fest and Book Fair   (Berkeley) $2,813, Main Street Martinsburg Food Truck Fest (Berkeley) $4,700, Malden Salt Fest  (Kanawha) $3,000, Mannington District Fair (Marion) $3,564, Marmet Labor Day Celebration   (Kanawha) $3,500, Marshall County Antique Power Show  (Marshall) $1,485, Marshall County Fair (Marshall) $3,564, Martinsburg Roundhouse Railfest (Berkeley) $2,000, Mason County Fair  (Mason) $2,970, Matewan Massacre Reenactment   (Mingo) $5,004, Matewan-Magnolia Fair   (Mingo) $15,932, McGrew House History Day   (Preston) $1,188, Meadow Bridge Hometown Festival   (Fayette) $1,000, Meadow River Days Festival   (Greenbrier) $1,782, Mercer County Fair  (Mercer) $1,188, Mercer County Heritage Festival (Mercer) $3,474, Milton Christmas in the Park   (Cabell) $1,485, Milton Old Timey Days  (Cabell) $1,485, Mineral County Veterans Day Parade  (Mineral) $891, Molasses Festival   (Calhoun) $1,188, Monongalia County Fair (Monongalia) $7,250, Moon Over Mountwood Fishing Festival   (Wood) $1,782, Morgan County Fair-History Wagon  (Morgan) $891, Moundsville Bass Festival   (Marshall) $2,376, Moundsville July 4th Celebration   (Marshall) $2,970, Mount Liberty Fall Festival   (Barbour) $1,485, Mountain Heritage Arts and Crafts Festival  (Jefferson) $2,970, Mountain Music Festival   (McDowell) $1,485, Mountain Roots Community Theater (Kanawha) $5,000, Mountain State Apple Harvest Festival   (Berkeley) $4,456, Mountain State Arts & Crafts Fair Cedar Lakes   (Jackson) $26,732, Mountaineer Boys' State (Lewis)  (Lewis) $5,000, Mullens Dogwood Festival   (Wyoming) $4,158, Multi-Cultural Festival of West Virginia   (Kanawha) $12,000, New Cumberland 4th of July   (Hancock) $2,970, New Cumberland Christmas Parade   (Hancock) $1,782, New Martinsville Regatta (Wetzel) $9,000, New Martinsville Vintage Regatta (Wetzel) $5,000, New River Bridge Day Festival   (Fayette) $23,762, Nicholas County Potato Festival  (Nicholas) $5,000, Oak Leaf Festival   (Fayette) $6,253, Oceana Heritage Festival   (Wyoming) $4,000, Oglebay City Park - Festival of Lights   (Ohio) $47,524, Oglebay Festival   (Ohio) $5,940, Ohio County Country Fair  (Ohio) $5,346, Old Brick Playhouse (Randolph) $7,000, Old Central City Fair   (Cabell) $2,970, Old Tyme Christmas   (Jefferson) $1,425, Osage Street Fair (Monongalia) $2,188, Parkersburg Homecoming   (Wood) $8,754, Paw Paw District Fair   (Marion) $2,079, Pax Reunion Committee   (Fayette) $2,970, Pendleton County 4-H Weekend  (Pendleton) $1,188, Petersburg 4th of July Celebration   (Grant) $11,881, Piedmont-Annual Back Street Festival   (Mineral) $2,376, Pinch Reunion   (Kanawha) $5,000, Pine Bluff Fall Festival   (Harrison) $2,376, Pine Grove 4th of July Festival   (Wetzel) $6,058, Pleasants County Agriculture Youth Fair  (Pleasants) $2,970, Pocahontas County Pioneer Days  (Pocahontas) $4,159, Pratt Fall Festival   (Kanawha) $2,500, Princeton Autumnfest   (Mercer) $1,563, Princeton Street Fair   (Mercer) $2,970, Putnam County Fair (Putnam) $2,970, Quartets on Parade   (Hardy) $2,376, Rainelle Fall Festival   (Greenbrier) $3,127, Rand Community Center Festival   (Kanawha) $2,500, Randolph County Community Arts Council  (Randolph) $1,782, Randolph County Fair  (Randolph) $4,158, Randolph County Ramps and Rails  (Randolph) $2,188, Ranson Christmas Festival   (Jefferson) $2,970, Ranson Festival   (Jefferson) $2,970, Renick Liberty Festival   (Greenbrier) $684, Rhododendron Girl's State (Ohio)  (Ohio) $5,941, Ripley 4th of July   (Jackson) $8,910, Ritchie County Pioneer Days  (Ritchie) $684, River City Festival   (Preston) $684, Rivesville Christmas Festival (Marion) $2,000, Rivesville Riverfront Festival (Marion) $2,000, Roane County Agriculture Field Day  (Roane) $1,782, Rock the Park  (Kanawha) $1,500, Rockin New Years Eve (Grant) $2,000, Rowlesburg Labor Day Festival   (Preston) $684, Ruby Summer Concert Series (Monongalia) $2,000, Ruddle Park Jamboree (Pendleton) $2,000, Rupert Country Fling   (Greenbrier) $1,876, Saint Spyridon Greek Festival   (Harrison) $1,485, Salem Apple Butter Festival   (Harrison) $2,376, Shiloh Days (Tyler) (Tyler) $2,000, Sissonville Christmas Festival (Kanawha) $2,000, Sistersville 4th of July   (Tyler) $4,776, Skirmish on the River   (Mingo) $1,250, Smoke on the Water   (Wetzel) $1,782, South Charleston Summerfest   (Kanawha) $7,500, Southern Wayne County Fall Festival  (Wayne) $684, Spirit of Grafton Celebration   (Taylor) $6,240, Spring Mountain Festival (Grant) $2,500, St. Albans City of Lights - December   (Kanawha) $3,000, St. Albans Train Fest  (Kanawha) $6,000, Sternwheel Festival   (Wood) $1,782, STOCO Festival (Raleigh) $1,485, Stonewall Jackson Heritage Arts & Crafts Jubilee    (Lewis) $6,534, Stonewall Jackson's Roundhouse Raid  (Berkeley) $7,200, Strawberry Festival   (Upshur) $17,821, Sylvester Big Coal River Festival  (Boone) $1,944, Tacy Fair   (Barbour) $684, Taste of Parkersburg   (Wood) $2,970, Taylor County Fair  (Taylor) $3,567, Three Rivers Coal Festival   (Marion) $4,604, Thunder on the Tygart - Mothers' Day Celebration   (Taylor) $7,300, Town of Delbarton 4th of July Celebration   (Mingo) $1,782, Town of Fayetteville Heritage Festival   (Fayette) $4,456, Town of Rivesville 4th of July Festival   (Marion) $3,127, Town of Winfield - Putnam County Homecoming (Putnam) $3,240, Treasure Mountain Festival   (Pendleton) $25,000, Tri-County Fair   (Grant) $22,548, Tucker County Arts Festival and Celebration  (Tucker) $10,692, Tucker County Fair  (Tucker) $2,821, Turkey Festival   (Hardy) $1,782, Tyler County Fireworks Celebration (Tyler) $3,000, Upper Kanawha Valley Oktoberfest   (Kanawha) $2,000, Upper Ohio Valley Italian Festival   (Ohio) $7,128, Valley District Fair   (Preston) $2,079, Veterans Welcome Home Celebration   (Cabell) $938, Vietnam Veterans of America # 949 Christmas Party   (Cabell) $684, Volcano Days at Mountwood Park   (Wood) $2,970, War Homecoming Fall Festival   (McDowell) $891, Wardensville Fall Festival   (Hardy) $2,970, Wayne County Fair  (Wayne) $2,970, Wayne County Fall Festival  (Wayne) $2,970, Webster County Fair (Webster) $3,600, Webster County Wood Chopping Festival  (Webster) $8,910, Webster Wild Water Weekend  (Webster) $1,188, Welcome Home Family Day   (Wayne) $1,900, Wellsburg Apple Festival of Brooke County  (Brooke) $2,970, West Virginia Chestnut Festival   (Preston) $684, West Virginia Coal Festival   (Boone) $5,940, West Virginia Dairy Cattle Show   (Lewis) $15,000, West Virginia Dandelion Festival   (Greenbrier) $2,970, West Virginia Day at the Railroad Museum  (Mercer) $1,800, West Virginia Fair and Exposition   (Wood) $4,812, West Virginia Freedom Festival (Logan) $4,456, West Virginia Oil and Gas Festival   (Tyler) $7,500, West Virginia Peach Festival  (Mineral) $5,166, West Virginia Pumpkin Festival   (Cabell) $5,940, West Virginia Rivers and Rails Festival (Pleasants) $1,099, West Virginia State Folk Festival  (Gilmer) $2,970, West Virginia Water Festival  (Summers) $9,144, Wetzel County Autumnfest  (Wetzel) $3,267, Wetzel County Town and Country Days  (Wetzel) $10,098, Wheeling City of Lights   (Ohio) $4,752, Wheeling Vintage Raceboat Regatta (Ohio) $11,881, Whipple Community Action   (Fayette) $1,485, Whitehall Community Event (Marion) $2,000, Winfield Watersports Weekend (Putnam) $3,240, Wirt County Fair  (Wirt) $1,485, Wirt County Pioneer Days  (Wirt) $1,188, Youth Stockman Beef Expo (Lewis) $1,188	Any Fairs and Festivals awards shall be funded in addition to, and not in lieu of, individual grant allocations derived from the Arts Council and Cultural Grant Program allocations. Division of Culture and History – Library Commission –Lottery Education Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 10)Fund 3559 FY 2026 Org 0432 Books and Films			17900	$	360,784Services to Libraries			18000		550,000Grants to Public Libraries			18200		9,439,571Digital Resources			30900		219,992Infomine Network (R)			88400		944,715	Total					$	11,515,062	Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation for Infomine Network (fund 3559, appropriation 88400) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Educational Broadcasting Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 10)Fund 3587 FY 2026 Org 0439		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 3587, appropriation 75500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Higher Education Policy Commission – Lottery Education – Higher Education Policy Commission – Control Account(W.V. Code Chapters 18B and 18C)Fund 4925 FY 2026 Org 0441 RHI Program and Site Support (R)			03600	$	1,924,101RHI Program and Site Support – 	RHEP Program Administration			03700		146,653RHI Program and Site Support – Grad Med	Ed and Fiscal Oversight (R)			03800		90,206State Doctoral Fellowship (R)			16600		129,604Health Sciences Scholarship (R)			17600		226,260Vice Chancellor for Health Sciences –	Rural Health Residency Program (R)			60100		62,725WV Engineering, Science, and 	Technology Scholarship Program			86800		452,831	Total					$	3,032,380		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for RHI Program and Site Support (fund 4925, appropriation 03600), RHI Program and Site Support – Grad Med Ed and Fiscal Oversight (fund 4925, appropriation 03800), State Doctoral Fellowship (fund 4925, appropriation 16600), Health Sciences Scholarship (fund 4925, appropriation 17600), and Vice Chancellor for Health Sciences – Rural Health Residency Program (fund 4925, appropriation 60100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The above appropriation for WV Engineering, Science, and Technology Scholarship Program (fund 4925, appropriation 86800) shall be transferred to the West Virginia Engineering, Science, and Technology Scholarship Fund (fund 4928) established by W.V. Code §18C-6-1. Community and Technical College – Capital Improvement Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 4908 FY 2026 Org 0442 Debt Service – Total			31000	$	5,000,000		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay and Improvements – Total (fund 4908, appropriation 84700) and Capital Improvements – Total (fund 4908, appropriation 95800) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		The total amount of this appropriation shall be paid from the sale of the Series 2017 Community and Technical Colleges Capital Improvement Refunding Revenue Bonds and anticipated interest earnings. Higher Education Policy Commission – Lottery Education – West Virginia University – School of Medicine(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 4185 FY 2026 Org 0463 WVU Health Sciences – 	RHI Program and Site Support (R)			03500	$	1,257,402MA Public Health Program and	Health Science Technology (R)			62300		53,020Health Sciences Career Opportunities Program (R)			86900		339,155HSTA Program (R)			87000		1,919,907Center for Excellence in Disabilities (R)			96700		330,867	Total					$	3,900,351		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for WVU Health Sciences – RHI Program and Site Support (fund 4185, appropriation 03500), MA Public Health Program and Health Science Technology (fund 4185, appropriation 62300), Health Sciences Career Opportunities Program (fund 4185, appropriation 86900), HSTA Program (fund 4185, appropriation 87000), and Center for Excellence in Disabilities (fund 4185, appropriation 96700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Higher Education Policy Commission – Lottery Education – Marshall University – School of Medicine(W.V. Code Chapter 18B)Fund 4896 FY 2026 Org 0471 Marshall Medical School –	RHI Program and Site Support (R)			03300	$	457,532Vice Chancellor for Health Sciences –	Rural Health Residency Program (R)			60100		181,171	Total					$	638,703		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Marshall Medical School – RHI Program and Site Support (fund 4896, appropriation 03300) and Vice Chancellor for Health Sciences – Rural Health Residency Program (fund 4896, appropriation 60100) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Bureau of Senior Services – Lottery Senior Citizens Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 5405 FY 2026 Org 0508 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	163,530Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		86,002Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Current Expenses			13000		332,284Local Programs Service Delivery Costs			20000		2,435,250Silver Haired Legislature			20200		18,500Transfer to Division of Human Services for Health Care	and Title XIX Waiver for Senior Citizens			53900		27,986,092Roger Tompkins Alzheimers Respite Care			64300		2,310,673WV Alzheimers Hotline			72400		45,000Regional Aged and Disabled Resource Center			76700		425,000Senior Services Medicaid Transfer			87100		16,400,070Legislative Initiatives for the Elderly			90400		9,671,239Long Term Care Ombudsmen			90500		297,226BRIM Premium			91300		7,718In-Home Services and Nutrition for Senior Citizens (R)			91700		6,845,941	Total					$	67,025,525		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriation for Senior Citizen Centers and Programs (fund 5405, appropriation 46200) and In-Home Services and Nutrition for Senior Citizens (fund 5405, appropriation 91700) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		Included in the above appropriation for Current Expenses (fund 5405, appropriation 13000), is funding to support an in-home direct care workforce registry.		The above appropriation for Transfer to the Department of Human Services for Health Care and Title XIX Waiver for Senior Citizens (fund 5405, appropriation 53900) along with the federal moneys generated thereby shall be used for reimbursement for services provided under the program. Total TITLE II, Section 4 – Lottery Revenue					$	157,392,000  Sec. 5. Appropriations from state excess lottery revenue fund. — In accordance with W.V. Code §29-22-18a, §29-22A-10d, §29-22A-10e, §29-22C-27a, and §29-25-22b, the following appropriations shall be deposited and disbursed by the Director of the Lottery to the following accounts in this section in the amounts indicated.		After first funding the appropriations required by W.V. Code §29-22-18a, §29-22A-10d, §29-22A-10e, §29-22C-27a, and §29-25-22b, the Director of the Lottery shall provide funding from the State Excess Lottery Revenue Fund for the remaining appropriations in this section to the extent that funds are available. In the event that revenues to the State Excess Lottery Revenue Fund are sufficient to meet all the appropriations required made pursuant to this section, then the Director of the Lottery shall then provide the funds available for fund 5365, appropriation 18900. Governor’s Office (W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 1046 FY 2026 Org 0100 		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Publication of Papers and Transition Expenses – Lottery Surplus (fund 1046, appropriation 06600) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Office of Technology (W.V. Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2532 FY 2026 Org 0231 		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Cyber Security (fund 2532, appropriation 99001), Enterprise Data Center (fund 2532, appropriation 99002), and Enterprise Telephony Modernization (fund 2532, appropriation 99003) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Economic Development (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 3170 FY 2026 Org 0307 		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Recreational Grants or Economic Development Loans (fund 3170, appropriation 25300) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Natural Resources – State Park Improvement FundFund 3277 FY 2026 Org 0310    							              Excess				Appro-		           Lottery				priation		         Funds                                        Repairs and Alterations (R)			06400	$	161,200Equipment (R)			07000		200,000Current Expenses (R)			13000		23,300Buildings (R)			25800		100,000Other Assets (R)			69000		1,020,500	Total					$	1,505,000		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for Repairs and Alterations (fund 3277, appropriation 06400), Equipment (fund 3277, appropriation 07000), Unclassified – Total (fund 3277, appropriation 09600), Current Expenses (fund 3277, appropriation 13000), Buildings (fund 3277, appropriation 25800), and Other Assets (fund 3277, appropriation 69000) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. West Virginia Infrastructure Council – West Virginia Infrastructure Transfer FundFund 3390 FY 2026 Org 0316 Directed Transfer			70000	$	46,000,000		The above appropriation shall be allocated pursuant to W.V. Code §29-22-18d and §31-15-9. Department of Education – School Building AuthorityFund 3514 FY 2026 Org 0404 Debt Service - Total			31000	$	16,571,230Directed Transfer			70000		2,428,770	Total					$	19,000,000		The School Building Authority shall have the authority to transfer between the above appropriations in accordance with W.V. Code §29-22-18a.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 3514, appropriation 70000) may be transferred to the Department of Education – State Board of Education – School Building Authority – School Construction Fund (fund 3952) to be used for school construction and maintenance projects. Higher Education Policy Commission – Education Improvement FundFund 4295 FY 2026 Org 0441 PROMISE Scholarship – Transfer			80000	$	29,000,000		The above appropriation shall be transferred to the PROMISE Scholarship Fund (fund 4296) established by W.V. Code §18C-7-7.		The Legislature has explicitly set a finite amount of available appropriations and directed the administrators of the Program to provide for the award of scholarships within the limits of available appropriations. Higher Education Policy Commission – Higher Education Improvement FundFund 4297 FY 2026 Org 0441 Directed Transfer			70000	$	15,000,000		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer shall be transferred to Higher Education Policy Commission – System – Tuition Fee Capital Improvement Fund (fund 4903) as authorized by Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 41. Higher Education Policy Commission – Administration –Control AccountFund 4932 FY 2026 Org 0441 		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Advanced Technology Centers (fund 4932, appropriation 02800) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Department of Human Services (W.V. Code Chapters 9, 48, and 49)Fund 5365 FY 2026 Org 0511 Medical Services			18900	$	80,805,007 Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation – Correctional Units(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 6283 FY 2026 Org 0608 		Any unexpended balance remaining in the appropriation for Capital Outlay and Maintenance (fund 6283, appropriation 75500) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Lottery Commission – General Purpose AccountFund 7206 FY 2026 Org 0705 General Revenue Fund – Transfer			70011	$	65,000,000		The above appropriation shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund as determined by the Director of the Lottery in accordance with W.V. Code §29-22-18a. Lottery Commission – Refundable CreditFund 7207 FY 2026 Org 0705 Directed Transfer			70000	$	10,000,000		The above appropriation shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund to provide reimbursement for the refundable credit allowable under W.V. Code §11-21-21.  The amount of the required transfer shall be determined solely by the State Tax Commissioner and shall be completed by the Director of the Lottery upon the Commissioner’s request. Lottery Commission – Distributions to Statutory Funds and PurposesFund 7213 FY 2026 Org 0705 Parking Garage Fund – Transfer			70001	$	300,0002004 Capitol Complex Parking Garage Fund – Transfer			70002		116,478Capitol Dome and Improvements Fund – Transfer			70003		1,096,256Capitol Renovation and Improvement Fund – Transfer			70004		2,381,252Economic Development Promotion and	Closing Fund – Transfer			70005		1,298,864Research Challenge Fund – Transfer			70006		1,731,820Tourism Promotion Fund – Transfer			70007		4,808,142Cultural Facilities and Capital Resources Matching	Grant Program Fund – Transfer			70008		1,500,000State Debt Reduction Fund – Transfer			70010		20,000,000General Revenue Fund – Transfer			70011		1,167,799West Virginia Racing Commission Racetrack	Video Lottery Account			70012		3,463,637Historic Resort Hotel Fund			70013		24,010Licensed Racetrack Regular Purse Fund			70014		22,383,247	Total					$	60,271,505 Racing Commission Fund 7308 FY 2026 Org 0707 Special Breeders Compensation	(W.V. Code §29-22-18a, subsection (I))			21800	$	2,000,000 Economic Development Authority – Cacapon and Beech Fork State Parks –Lottery Revenue Debt ServiceFund 9067 FY 2026 Org 0944 Debt Service			04000	$	2,032,000 Economic Development Authority – State Parks Lottery Revenue Debt Service FundFund 9068 FY 2026 Org 0944 Debt Service			04000	$	4,395,000 Total TITLE II, Section 5 – Excess Lottery Funds					$	335,008,512 		Sec. 6. Appropriations of federal funds. — In accordance with Article 11, Chapter 4 of the Code from federal funds there are hereby appropriated conditionally upon the fulfillment of the provisions set forth in Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code the following amounts, as itemized, for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. LEGISLATIVE Crime Victims Compensation Fund (W.V. Code Chapter 14)Fund 8738 FY 2026 Org 2300					Appro-		Federal					priation		Funds Economic Loss Claim Payment Fund			33400	$	650,000JUDICIAL Supreme Court Fund 8867 FY 2026 Org 2400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,175,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		100,000Equipment			07000		250,000Current Expenses			13000		1,275,000Other Assets			69000		200,000	Total					$	4,000,000EXECUTIVE Governor’s Office – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 4)Fund 8823 FY 2026 Org 0100 Repairs and Alterations			06400	$	1,000Equipment			07000		1,000Unclassified			09900		500,000Current Expenses			13000		25,497,000Other Assets			69000		1,000	Total					$	26,000,000 Department of Agriculture (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 8736 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,722,216Repairs and Alterations			06400		650,000Equipment			07000		910,500Unclassified			09900		50,534Current Expenses			13000		6,841,987Buildings			25800	         	1,000,000Other Assets			69000		550,000Land				73000		500,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		4,721,430	Total					$	17,946,667 Department of Agriculture – Meat Inspection Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 8737 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	739,966Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,500Equipment			07000		114,478Unclassified			09900		8,755Current Expenses			13000		136,012	Total					$	1,004,711 Department of Agriculture – State Conservation Committee(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 8783 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	99,978Current Expenses			13000		15,599,974	Total					$	15,699,952 Department of Agriculture – Land Protection Authority(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 8896 FY 2026 Org 1400 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	46,526Unclassified			09900		5,004Current Expenses			13000		448,920	Total					$	500,450 Attorney General – Medicaid Fraud Unit(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 8882 FY 2026 Org 1500 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,960,197Repairs and Alterations			06400		4,313Equipment			07000		7,500Unclassified			09900		15,336Current Expenses			13000		611,287Other Assets			69000		11,336	Total					$	2,609,969 Secretary of State – State Election Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 3)Fund 8854 FY 2026 Org 1600 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	210,240Repairs and Alterations			06400		15,000Unclassified			09900		7,484Current Expenses			13000		415,727Other Assets			69000		100,000	Total					$	748,451 DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE Division of Forestry (W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 8703 FY 2026 Org 0305 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	645,226Repairs and Alterations			06400		155,795Equipment			07000		1,000,000Unclassified			09900		51,050Current Expenses			13000		3,062,013Other Assets			69000		3,078,847	Total					$	7,992,931 Geological and Economic Survey (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8704 FY 2026 Org 0306 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	204,432Repairs and Alterations			06400		305,000Equipment			07000		187,500Unclassified			09900		2,803Current Expenses			13000		195,639Buildings			25800		500,000Other Assets			69000		15,000	Total					$	1,410,374 Division of Economic Development (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 8705 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,808,480Unclassified			09900		50,000Current Expenses			13000		21,304,019Broadband Federal Funding			87101		792,031,764	Total					$	815,194,263 Office of Energy (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 8892 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,020,137Unclassified			09900		7,350Current Expenses			13000		8,266,076	Total					$	9,293,563 Division of Economic Development – Office of Economic Opportunity(W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 8901 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	857,689Repairs and Alterations			06400		250Equipment			07000		6,000Unclassified			09900		106,795Current Expenses			13000		20,303,081	Total					$	21,273,815 Division of Labor (W.V. Code Chapters 21 and 47)Fund 8706 FY 2026 Org 0308 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	460,197Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Unclassified			09900		5,572Current Expenses			13000		167,098	Total					$	633,367 Division of Natural Resources (W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 8707 FY 2026 Org 0310 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	11,474,295Repairs and Alterations			06400		566,250Equipment			07000		2,126,141Unclassified			09900		107,693Current Expenses			13000		7,887,660Administration			15500		50,325Buildings			25800		951,000Other Assets			69000		4,768,670Land				73000		2,893,920	Total					$	30,825,954 Division of Miners’ Health, Safety and Training (W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 8709 FY 2026 Org 0314Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	708,694Current Expenses			13000		150,000	Total					$	858,694 WorkForce West Virginia (W.V. Code Chapter 23)Fund 8835 FY 2026 Org 0323 Unclassified			09900	$	5,127Current Expenses			13000		667,530Reed Act 2002 – Unemployment Compensation			62200		4,446,737Reed Act 2002 – Employment Services			63000		3,246,737	Total					$	8,366,131		Pursuant to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1103, Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, and the provisions of W.V. Code §21A-9-9, the above appropriation to Unclassified and Current Expenses shall be used by WorkForce West Virginia for the specific purpose of administration of the State’s unemployment insurance program or job service activities, subject to each and every restriction, limitation or obligation imposed on the use of the funds by those federal and state statutes. State Board of Rehabilitation – Division of Rehabilitation Services(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 8734 FY 2026 Org 0932 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	12,642,892Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		153,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		350,400Equipment			07000		1,275,870Current Expenses			13000		68,440,940	Total					$	82,863,102 State Board of Rehabilitation – Division of Rehabilitation Services –Disability Determination Services(W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 8890 FY 2026 Org 0932 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	19,748,690Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,100Equipment			07000		83,350Current Expenses			13000		13,383,206	Total					$	33,216,346 DEPARTMENT OF TOURISM Department of Tourism – Tourism Workforce Development Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 8903 FY 2026 Org 0304 Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101	$	2,765,115 Division of Culture and History (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8718 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	927,795Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Equipment			07000		1,000Current Expenses			13000		1,947,372Buildings			25800		1,000Other Assets			69000		1,000Land				73000		360	Total					$	2,879,527 Library Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 10)Fund 8720 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	387,033Equipment			07000		543,406Current Expenses			13000		1,076,162Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		2,388,880	Total					$	4,395,481 Commission for National and Community Service (W.V. Code Chapter 5F)Fund 8841 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	471,153Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,000Current Expenses			13000		5,587,325Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		1,960,558	Total					$	8,020,036 National Coal Heritage Area Authority (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8869 FY 2026 Org 0432 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	201,942Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		3,000Current Expenses			13000		328,008Other Assets			69000		2,000	Total					$	539,950DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION State Board of Education – State Department of Education(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 8712 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	6,146,942Repairs and Alterations			06400		10,000Equipment			07000		10,000Unclassified			09900		2,000,000Current Expenses			13000		834,146,008Other Assets			69000		10,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		4,990,123	Total					$	847,313,073 State Board of Education – School Lunch Program(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 8713 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,010,501Repairs and Alterations			06400		20,000Equipment			07000		100,000Unclassified			09900		1,150,500Current Expenses			13000		258,781,265Other Assets			69000		25,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		743,436	Total					$	262,830,702 State Board of Education – Vocational Division(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 8714 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,032,898 Repairs and Alterations			06400		10,000Equipment			07000		10,000Unclassified			09900		155,000Current Expenses			13000		20,820,081Other Assets			69000		10,000	Total					$	23,037,979 State Board of Education – Aid for Exceptional Children(W.V. Code Chapters 18 and 18A)Fund 8715 FY 2026 Org 0402 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,671,135 Repairs and Alterations			06400		10,000Equipment			07000		10,000Unclassified			09900		1,000,000Current Expenses			13000		139,346,390Other Assets			69000		10,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		17,336,635	Total					$	161,384,160 WV Professional Charter School Board (W.V. Code Chapter 18)Fund 8828 FY 2026 Org 0405 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	99,805Repairs and Alterations			06400		100Equipment			07000		100Current Expenses			13000		4,287,108Other Assets			69000		100	Total					$	4,387,213 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION Division of Environmental Protection (W.V. Code Chapter 22)Fund 8708 FY 2026 Org 0313 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	37,148,357Repairs and Alterations			06400		739,783Equipment			07000		1,712,238Unclassified			09900		1,923,580Current Expenses			13000		347,447,019West Virginia Drinking Water Treatment 	Revolving Fund – Transfer			68900		80,753,300Other Assets			69000		2,177,261Land				73000		80,000	Total					$	471,981,538 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH Department of Health – Central Office(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 8802 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	21,101,605Equipment			07000		456,972Unclassified			09900		856,614Current Expenses			13000		139,553,476Buildings			25800		155,000Other Assets			69000		380,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		40,061,935	Total					$	202,565,602 Human Rights Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 5)Fund 8725 FY 2026 Org 0510 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	737,485Unclassified			09900		5,050Current Expenses			13000		164,950	Total					$	907,485 Office of the Inspector General (W.V. Code Chapter 16B)Fund 8211 FY 2026 Org 0513 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,346,638Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Equipment			07000		500Unclassified			09900		8,335Current Expenses			13000		943,527Other Assets			69000		500	Total					$	3,300,000DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES Department of Human Services (W.V. Code Chapters 9, 48, and 49)Fund 8722 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	88,722,032Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		73,500Unclassified			09900		22,855,833Current Expenses			13000		207,311,984Medical Services			18900		4,151,432,776Medical Services Administrative Costs			78900		170,074,119CHIP Administrative Costs			85601		7,627,469CHIP Services			85602		65,805,357Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		4,000,000	Total					$	4,717,903,070 Department of Human Services – Consolidated Medical Service Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 16)Fund 8723 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,485,132Unclassified			09900		73,307Current Expenses			13000		103,197,690Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		564,772	Total					$	105,320,901DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY Division of Emergency Management (W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 8727 FY 2026 Org 0606 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,035,385Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		61,250Repairs and Alterations			06400		5,000Equipment			07000		100,000Current Expenses			13000		20,429,281	Total					$	22,630,916 Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation (W.V. Code Chapters 15A)Fund 8836 FY 2026 Org 0608 Unclassified			09900	$	1,100Current Expenses			13000		1,900	Total					$	3,000 West Virginia State Police (W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 8741 FY 2026 Org 0612 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,266,412Repairs and Alterations			06400		42,000Equipment			07000		13,356,035Current Expenses			13000		2,250,971Buildings			25800		1,740,500Other Assets			69000		1,065,750Land				73000		500	Total					$	21,722,168 Fire Commission (W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 8819 FY 2026 Org 0619 Current Expenses			13000	$	80,000 Division of Administrative Services (W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 8803 FY 2026 Org 0623 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,363,346Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,750Unclassified			09900		25,185Current Expenses			13000		75,381,973	Total					$	76,772,254 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE Insurance Commissioner (W.V. Code Chapter 33)Fund 8883 FY 2026 Org 0704 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	145,000Equipment			07000		30,000Current Expenses			13000		2,825,000	Total					$	3,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Division of Motor Vehicles (W.V. Code Chapter 17B)Fund 8787 FY 2026 Org 0802 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	900,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		500Current Expenses			13000		5,448,106	Total					$	6,348,606 Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – Public Transit(W.V. Code Chapter 17)Fund 8745 FY 2026 Org 0810 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,089,934Repairs and Alterations			06400		2,500Equipment			07000		3,501,714Current Expenses			13000		20,863,149Buildings			25800		2,450,000Other Assets			69000		250,000	Total					$	28,157,297 Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities – Aeronautics Commission(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8831 FY 2026 Org 0810 Current Expenses			13000	$	199,800Other Assets			69000		100	Total					$	199,900 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ ASSISTANCE Department of Veterans’ Assistance (W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 8858 FY 2026 Org 0613 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,453,384Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		57,120Repairs and Alterations			06400		20,000Equipment			07000		25,000Current Expenses			13000		3,840,300Buildings			25800		22,750,000Land				73000		500Veterans’ Cemetery			80800		175,000Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		1,900,000	Total					$	32,221,304 Department of Veterans’ Assistance – Veterans’ Home(W.V. Code Chapter 9A)Fund 8728 FY 2026 Org 0618 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,062,331Repairs and Alterations			06400		60,500Equipment			07000		10,500Current Expenses			13000		618,180Buildings			25800		500Other Assets			69000		6,500Land				73000		100Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		1,600,000	Total					$	3,358,611 BUREAU OF SENIOR SERVICES Bureau of Senior Services (W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 8724 FY 2026 Org 0508 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	857,874Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		12,782Repairs and Alterations			06400		3,000Current Expenses			13000		13,811,853	Total					$	14,685,509 MISCELLANEOUS BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS Adjutant General – State Militia(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 8726 FY 2026 Org 0603 Unclassified			09900	$	982,705Mountaineer ChalleNGe Academy			70900		12,312,486Martinsburg Starbase			74200		890,990Charleston Starbase			74300		857,297Military Authority			74800		90,033,787	Total					$	105,077,265		The Adjutant General shall have the authority to transfer between appropriations. Adjutant General – West Virginia National Guard Counterdrug Forfeiture Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 15)Fund 8785 FY 2026 Org 0603 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,350,000Repairs and Alterations			06400		50,000Equipment			07000		200,000Current Expenses			13000		150,000Buildings			25800		100,000Other Assets			69000		100,000Land				73000		50,000	Total					$	2,000,000 Public Service Commission – Motor Carrier Division(W.V. Code Chapter 24A)Fund 8743 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	1,600,289Repairs and Alterations			06400		39,000Equipment			07000		1,000Current Expenses			13000		368,953	Total					$	2,009,242 Public Service Commission – Gas Pipeline Division			(W.V. Code Chapter 24B)Fund 8744 FY 2026 Org 0926 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	725,664Equipment			07000		3,000Unclassified			09900		4,072Current Expenses			13000		124,628	Total					$	857,364 Economic Development Authority (W.V. Code Chapter 31)Fund 8893 FY 2026 Org 0944 Current Expenses			13000		5,000,000Total TITLE II, Section 6 – Federal Funds					$	8,224,744,008		Sec. 7. Appropriations from federal block grants. — The following items are hereby appropriated from federal block grants to be available for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026. Division of Economic Development – Community DevelopmentFund 8746 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	10,672,367Unclassified			09900		2,375,000Current Expenses			13000		224,476,883	Total					$	237,524,250 Division of Economic Development – Office of Economic Opportunity –Community ServicesFund 8902 FY 2026 Org 0307 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	773,389Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,500Equipment			07000		9,000Unclassified			09900		125,000Current Expenses			13000		17,781,811	Total					$	18,690,700 WorkForce West Virginia – Workforce Investment ActFund 8749 FY 2026 Org 0323 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,036,190Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary and	Agency Heads			00201		124,018Repairs and Alterations			06400		1,600Equipment			07000		500Unclassified			09900		23,023Current Expenses			13000		63,381,511Buildings			25800		1,100	Total					$	66,567,942 Department of Health – Maternal and Child HealthFund 8750 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,509,103Unclassified			09900		81,439Current Expenses			13000		7,294,267	Total					$	9,884,809 Department of Health – Preventive HealthFund 8753 FY 2026 Org 0506 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	283,642Equipment			07000		165,642Unclassified			09900		22,457Current Expenses			13000		1,895,366	Total					$	2,367,107 Department of Human Services – Energy AssistanceFund 8755 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,733,782Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary	And Agency Heads			00201		2,450Unclassified			09900		350,000Current Expenses			13000		57,082,035	Total					$	60,168,267 Department of Human Services – Social ServicesFund 8757 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	9,709,574Unclassified			09900		171,982Current Expenses			13000		8,870,508	Total					$	18,752,064 Department of Human Services – Substance Abuse Prevention and TreatmentFund 8793 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	736,598Unclassified			09900		115,924Current Expenses			13000		10,853,740Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		4,225,212	Total					$	15,931,474 Department of Human Services – Community Mental Health ServicesFund 8794 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	748,144Unclassified			09900		33,533Current Expenses			13000		9,735,527Federal Coronavirus Pandemic			89101		2,070,960	Total					$	12,588,164 Department of Human Services – Temporary Assistance for Needy FamiliesFund 8816 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	22,903,080Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary	And Agency Head			00201		7,350Unclassified			09900		1,250,000Current Expenses			13000		152,504,134	Total					$	176,664,564 Department of Human Services – Child Care and DevelopmentFund 8817 FY 2026 Org 0511 Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	3,753,484Salary and Benefits of Cabinet Secretary	And Agency Head			00201		2,450Unclassified			09900		350,000Current Expenses			13000		107,150,000	Total					$	111,255,934Total TITLE II, Section 7 – Federal Block Grants					$	730,395,275  Sec. 8. Awards for claims against the state. — There are hereby appropriated for fiscal year 2026, from the fund as designated, in the amounts as specified, general revenue funds in the amount of $1,100,000, special revenue funds in the amount of $250,000, and state road funds in the amount of $864,750 for payment of claims against the state. 		Sec. 9. Appropriations from general revenue fund surplus accrued.  — The following items are hereby appropriated from the state fund, general revenue, and are to be available for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026 out of surplus funds only, accrued from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.		It is the intent and mandate of the Legislature that the following appropriations be payable only from surplus as of July 31, 2025 from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, only after first meeting requirements of W.Va. Code §11B-2-20(b).		In the event that surplus revenues available on July 31, 2025, are not sufficient to meet the appropriations made pursuant to this section, then the appropriations shall be made to the extent that surplus funds are available as of the date mandated to meet the appropriations in this section and shall be allocated first to provide the necessary funds to meet the first appropriation of this section and each subsequent appropriation in the order listed in this section. Division of Highways (W.V. Code Chapter 17 and 17C)Fund 0620 FY 2026 Org 0803 Direct Transfer - Surplus			70099	$	125,000,000		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer – Surplus (fund 0620, appropriation 70099) shall be transferred to Division of Highways (fund 9017). Division of Economic Development – (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0256 FY 2026 Org 0307Directed Transfer - Surplus			70099	$	75,000,000	The above appropriation for Directed Transfer – Surplus (fund 0256, appropriation 70099) shall be transferred to the Economic Development Project Fund (fund 9069). Division of Economic Development – (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0256 FY 2026 Org 0307Directed Transfer - Surplus			70099	$	10,000,000	The above appropriation for Directed Transfer – Surplus (fund 0256, appropriation 70099) shall be transferred to the Water Development Authority (fund 3382). Division of Economic Development – (W.V. Code Chapter 5B)Fund 0256 FY 2026 Org 0307Current Expense - Surplus			13099	$	250,000	The above appropriation for Current Expense – Surplus (fund 0256, appropriation 13099) shall be granted to the Cabell County Commission for Lily’s Place.Total TITLE II, Section 9 – General Revenue Surplus Accrued					$	210,250,000		Sec. 10. Appropriations from lottery net profits surplus accrued. — The following items are hereby appropriated from the lottery net profits, and are to be available for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026 out of surplus funds only, as determined by the Director of Lottery, accrued from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.		It is the intent and mandate of the Legislature that the following appropriations be payable only from surplus accrued from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.		In the event that surplus revenues available from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, are not sufficient to meet the appropriations made pursuant to this section, then the appropriations shall be made to the extent that surplus funds are available. Bureau of Senior Services – Lottery Senior Citizens Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 29)Fund 5405 FY 2026 Org 0508Senior Services Medicaid Transfer – Lottery Surplus			68199	$	14,750,000In-Home Services and Nutrition for Senior Citizens – Surplus			76699		2,000,000	Total						16,750,000Total TITLE II, Section 10 – Surplus Accrued					$	16,750,000		Sec. 11. Appropriations from state excess lottery revenue surplus accrued. — The following items are hereby appropriated from the state excess lottery revenue fund, and are to be available for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026 out of surplus funds only, as determined by the Director of Lottery, accrued from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this section.		It is the intent and mandate of the Legislature that the following appropriations be payable only from surplus accrued from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.		In the event that surplus revenues available from the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, are not sufficient to meet the appropriations made pursuant to this section, then the appropriations shall be made to the extent that surplus funds are available. Racing Commission – General Administration(W.V. Code Chapter 19)Fund 7308 FY 2026 Org 0707Directed Transfer – Lottery Surplus				70098	$	800,000		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer – Lottery Surplus (fund 7308, appropriation 70098), $800,000 shall be transferred to the Racing Commission – General Administration (fund 7305). Department of Human Services (W.V. Code Chapters 9, 48, and 49)Fund 5365 FY 2026 Org 0511 Medical Services – Lottery Surplus			68100	$	20,545,488 Total TITLE II, Section 11 – Surplus Accrued					$	21,345,488 Sec. 12. Special revenue appropriations. — There are hereby appropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026 special revenues collected pursuant to general law enactment of the Legislature which are not paid into the state fund as general revenue under the provisions of W.V. Code §12-2-2 and are not expressly appropriated under this act:  Provided, That none of the money so appropriated by this section shall be available for expenditure except in compliance with the provisions of W.V. Code §12-2-1 et seq.,  W.V. Code §12-3-1 et seq., and W.V. Code §11B-2-1 et seq., unless the spending unit has filed with the Director of the Budget and the Legislative Auditor prior to the beginning of each fiscal year:		(a) An estimate of the amount and sources of all revenues accruing to such fund; and		(b) A detailed expenditure schedule showing for what purposes the fund is to be expended: Provided, however, That federal funds received by the state may be expended only in accordance with Sections (6) or (7) of this Title and with W.V. Code §4-11-1, et seq. Provided further, That federal funds that become available to a spending unit for expenditure while the Legislature is not in session and the availability of such funds could not reasonably have been anticipated and included in this act may be only be expended in the limited circumstances provided by W.V. Code §4-11-5(d):  And provided further, That no provision of this act may be construed to authorize the expenditure of federal funds except as provided in this section.	During Fiscal Year 2026, the following funds are hereby available and are to be transferred to the Department of Health and Human Resources, Division of Human Services – Medical Services Trust Fund (fund 5185) from available balances per the following: – Division of General Services – Capitol Complex Parking Garage Fund(WV Code Chapter 5A)Fund 2461 FY 2026 Org 0211Directed Transfer			70000	$	1,000,000 - Division of Labor – Bedding and Upholstery Fund(W.V. Code Chapter 47)Fund 3198 FY 2026 Org 0308Directed Transfer			70000	$	1,000,000 - Division of Natural Resources – Planning and Development Division(W.V. Code Chapter 20)Fund 3205 FY 2026 Org 0310Directed Transfer			70000	$	2,000,000 - Fire Commission – Fire Marshal Fees(W.V. Code Chapter 15A)Fund 6152 FY 2026 Org 0619Directed Transfer			70000	$	4,000,000 - Public Service Commission – Motor Carrier Division(W.V. Code Chapter 24A)Fund 8625 FY 2026 Org 0926Directed Transfer			70000	$	4,000,000Total TITLE II, Section 12 – Special Revenue Appropriation					$	12,000,000  Sec. 13. State improvement fund appropriations. — Bequests or donations of nonpublic funds, received by the Governor on behalf of the state during the fiscal year 2026, for the purpose of making studies and recommendations relative to improvements of the administration and management of spending units in the executive branch of state government, shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate account therein designated state improvement fund.		There are hereby appropriated all moneys so deposited during the fiscal year 2026 to be expended as authorized by the Governor, for such studies and recommendations which may encompass any problems of organization, procedures, systems, functions, powers or duties of a state spending unit in the executive branch, or the betterment of the economic, social, educational, health and general welfare of the state or its citizens.  Sec. 14. Specific funds and collection accounts. — A fund or collection account which by law is dedicated to a specific use is hereby appropriated in sufficient amount to meet all lawful demands upon the fund or collection account and shall be expended according to the provisions of Article 3, Chapter 12 of the Code.  Sec. 15. Appropriations for refunding erroneous payment. — Money that has been erroneously paid into the state treasury is hereby appropriated out of the fund into which it was paid, for refund to the proper person.		When the officer authorized by law to collect money for the state finds that a sum has been erroneously paid, he or she shall issue his or her requisition upon the Auditor for the refunding of the proper amount. The Auditor shall issue his or her warrant to the Treasurer and the Treasurer shall pay the warrant out of the fund into which the amount was originally paid.  Sec. 16. Sinking fund deficiencies. — There is hereby appropriated to the Governor a sufficient amount to meet any deficiencies that may arise in the Mortgage Finance Bond Insurance fund of the West Virginia Housing Development Fund which is under the supervision and control of the Municipal Bond Commission as provided by W.V. Code §31-18-20b, or in the funds of the Municipal Bond Commission because of the failure of any state agency for either general obligation or revenue bonds or any local taxing district for general obligation bonds to remit funds necessary for the payment of interest and sinking fund requirements. The Governor is authorized to transfer from time to time such amounts to the Municipal Bond Commission as may be necessary for these purposes.		The Municipal Bond Commission shall reimburse the State of West Virginia through the Governor from the first remittance collected from the West Virginia Housing Development Fund or from any state agency or local taxing district for which the Governor advanced funds, with interest at the rate carried by the bonds for security or payment of which the advance was made.  Sec. 17. Appropriations for local governments. — There are hereby appropriated for payment to counties, districts, and municipal corporations such amounts as will be necessary to pay taxes due counties, districts, and municipal corporations and which have been paid into the treasury:		(a) For redemption of lands;		(b) By public service corporations;		(c) For tax forfeitures.  Sec. 18. Total appropriations. — Where only a total sum is appropriated to a spending unit, the total sum shall include personal services and employee benefits, annual increment, current expenses, repairs and alterations, buildings, equipment, other assets, land, and capital outlay, where not otherwise specifically provided and except as otherwise provided in TITLE I – GENERAL PROVISIONS, Sec. 3.  Sec. 19. General school fund. — The balance of the proceeds of the general school fund remaining after the payment of the appropriations made by this act is appropriated for expenditure in accordance with W.V. Code §18-9A-16. TITLE III – ADMINISTRATION Sec. 1. Appropriations conditional. — The expenditure of the appropriations made by this act, except those appropriations made to the legislative and judicial branches of the state government, are conditioned upon the compliance by the spending unit with the requirements of Article 2, Chapter 11B of the Code.		Where spending units or parts of spending units have been absorbed by or combined with other spending units, it is the intent of this act that appropriations and reappropriations shall be to the succeeding or later spending unit created, unless otherwise indicated. Sec. 2. Constitutionality. — If any part of this act is declared unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, its decision shall not affect any portion of this act which remains, but the remaining portion shall be in full force and effect as if the portion declared unconstitutional had never been a part of the act. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home